Missouri, session 2025S2, HB1.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 128.345, 128.346, and 128.348, RSMo, are repealed and twelve
2 new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 128.345, 128.346, 128.348,
3 128.471, 128.472, 128.473, 128.474, 128.475, 128.476, 128.477, 128.478, and 128.479, to
4 read as follows:
128.345. 1. All referencesin sections128.451 to 128.458 to counties,voting districts
2 (VTD),andtract-blocks(Block)meanthosecounties,votingdistricts(VTD),andtract-blocks
3 (Block)asreportedtothestatebytheUnitedStatesBureauoftheCensusforthe2010census.
4 2. Allreferencesinsections128.461to[128.468]128.478tocounties,votingdistricts
5 (VTD),andtract-blocks(Block)meanthosecounties,votingdistricts(VTD),andtract-blocks
6 (Block)asreportedtothestatebytheUnitedStatesBureauoftheCensusforthe2020census.
128.346. 1. Thedistrictsestablishedbytheprovisionsofsections128.400to128.440
2 for the election of representatives to the Congress of the United States shall be effective
3 beginningwithelectiontothe108thCongressandthroughtheelectionofthe112thCongress.
4 2. The districts established by sections 128.451 to 128.458 for the election of
5 representatives to the Congress of the United States shall be effective beginning with the
6 election to the 113th Congress and through the election of the 117th Congress.
7 3. The districts established by sections 128.461 to 128.468 for the election of
8 representatives to the Congress of the United States shall be effective beginning with the
9 election to the 118th Congress and through the election of the 119th Congress.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1 2
10 4. The districts established by sections 128.471 to 128.478 for the election of
11 representatives to the Congress of the United States shall be effective beginning with the
12 election of the 120th Congress.
128.348. 1. Effective with the election for the 113th Congress and through the
2 election of the 117th Congress, the state of Missouri shall consist of eight congressional
3 districts.
4 2. Effectivewiththeelectionofthe118thCongress,thestateofMissourishallconsist
5 of eight congressional districts.
6 3. Effective with the election of the 120th Congress, the state of Missouri shall
7 consist of eight congressional districts.
8 4. The legal voters of each district shall elect one member of Congress of the United
9 States.
128.471. The first congressional district shall be composed of the following:
2 County: St. Louis City MO
3 County: St. Louis MO
4 VTD: AP001
5 VTD: AP002
6 VTD: AP003
7 VTD: AP004
8 VTD: AP005
9 VTD: AP006
10 VTD: AP007
11 VTD: AP008
12 VTD: AP009
13 VTD: AP010
14 VTD: AP011
15 VTD: AP012
16 VTD: AP013
17 VTD: AP014
18 VTD: AP015
19 VTD: AP016
20 VTD: AP017
21 VTD: AP018
22 VTD: AP019
23 VTD: AP020
24 VTD: AP021
25 VTD: AP022

HB 1 3
26 VTD: AP023
27 VTD: AP024
28 VTD: AP025
29 VTD: AP026
30 VTD: AP027
31 VTD: AP028
32 VTD: AP029
33 VTD: AP030
34 VTD: AP031
35 VTD: AP033
36 VTD: AP034
37 VTD: AP035
38 VTD: AP036
39 VTD: AP037
40 VTD: AP038
41 VTD: AP039
42 VTD: AP040
43 VTD: AP042
44 VTD: AP043
45 VTD: AP044
46 VTD: AP045
47 VTD: AP046
48 VTD: AP047
49 VTD: AP048
50 VTD: AP049
51 VTD: AP050
52 VTD: AP051
53 VTD: AP200
54 VTD: AP203
55 VTD: AP206
56 VTD: AP207
57 VTD: AP208
58 VTD: AP211
59 VTD: AP214
60 VTD: AP215
61 VTD: AP216
62 VTD: AP217

HB 1 4
63 VTD: AP218
64 VTD: AP225
65 VTD: AP230
66 VTD: AP232
67 VTD: AP233
68 VTD: AP237
69 VTD: CC012
70 VTD: CC013
71 VTD: CC022
72 VTD: CC043
73 VTD: CC048
74 Block: 291892155004011
75 VTD CC048 Subtotal
76 VTD: CC051
77 VTD: CC057
78 VTD: CC203
79 Block: 291892156001019
80 VTD CC203 Subtotal
81 VTD: CC205
82 VTD: CLA001
83 VTD: CLA002
84 VTD: CLA003
85 VTD: CLA004
86 Block: 291892165004005
87 Block: 291892165004006
88 Block: 291892165004007
89 Block: 291892165004008
90 Block: 291892165004009
91 Block: 291892165004010
92 Block: 291892165004011
93 Block: 291892165004012
94 Block: 291892165004013
95 Block: 291892165004014
96 Block: 291892165004015
97 Block: 291892165004016
98 Block: 291892165004017
99 Block: 291892165004018

HB 1 5
100 Block: 291892165004019
101 Block: 291892165004020
102 Block: 291892165004022
103 Block: 291892165004023
104 Block: 291892165004024
105 Block: 291892165004025
106 Block: 291892165004026
107 VTD CLA004 Subtotal
108 VTD: CLA005
109 VTD: CLA008
110 VTD: CLA009
111 VTD: CLA010
112 VTD: CLA011
113 VTD: CLA013
114 Block: 291892165004021
115 VTD CLA013 Subtotal
116 VTD: CLA017
117 VTD: CLA019
118 VTD: CLA020
119 VTD: CLA021
120 VTD: CLA022
121 VTD: CLA023
122 VTD: CLA027
123 VTD: CLA029
124 VTD: CLA030
125 VTD: CLA031
126 VTD: CLA032
127 VTD: CLA035
128 VTD: CLA038
129 VTD: CLA039
130 VTD: CLA041
131 VTD: CLA043
132 VTD: CLA044
133 VTD: CLA046
134 VTD: CLA050
135 VTD: CLA051
136 VTD: CLA052

HB 1 6
137 VTD: CLA200
138 VTD: CLA206
139 VTD: FER001
140 VTD: FER002
141 VTD: FER003
142 VTD: FER004
143 VTD: FER005
144 VTD: FER006
145 VTD: FER007
146 VTD: FER008
147 VTD: FER009
148 VTD: FER010
149 VTD: FER011
150 VTD: FER012
151 VTD: FER013
152 VTD: FER014
153 VTD: FER015
154 VTD: FER016
155 VTD: FER017
156 VTD: FER018
157 VTD: FER019
158 VTD: FER020
159 VTD: FER021
160 VTD: FER022
161 VTD: FER023
162 VTD: FER024
163 VTD: FER025
164 VTD: FER026
165 VTD: FER027
166 VTD: FER028
167 VTD: FER029
168 VTD: FER030
169 VTD: FER031
170 VTD: FER032
171 VTD: FER033
172 VTD: FER034
173 VTD: FER035

HB 1 7
174 VTD: FER036
175 VTD: FER037
176 VTD: FER038
177 VTD: FER039
178 VTD: FER040
179 VTD: FER041
180 VTD: FER042
181 VTD: FER043
182 VTD: FER044
183 VTD: FER045
184 VTD: FER046
185 VTD: FER206
186 VTD: FER207
187 VTD: FER208
188 VTD: FLO001
189 VTD: FLO002
190 VTD: FLO003
191 VTD: FLO004
192 VTD: FLO005
193 VTD: FLO006
194 VTD: FLO007
195 VTD: FLO008
196 VTD: FLO009
197 VTD: FLO010
198 VTD: FLO011
199 VTD: FLO012
200 VTD: FLO013
201 VTD: FLO014
202 VTD: FLO015
203 VTD: FLO016
204 VTD: FLO017
205 VTD: FLO018
206 VTD: FLO019
207 VTD: FLO020
208 VTD: FLO021
209 VTD: FLO022
210 VTD: FLO023

HB 1 8
211 VTD: FLO024
212 VTD: FLO025
213 VTD: FLO026
214 VTD: FLO027
215 VTD: FLO028
216 VTD: FLO029
217 VTD: FLO030
218 VTD: FLO031
219 VTD: FLO200
220 VTD: FLO201
221 VTD: FLO205
222 VTD: FLO207
223 VTD: GRA007
224 Block: 291892198011012
225 Block: 291892198011013
226 Block: 291892198011014
227 Block: 291892198011020
228 Block: 291892198012013
229 Block: 291892198012015
230 Block: 291892198012016
231 VTD GRA007 Subtotal
232 VTD: GRA015
233 Block: 291892197003015
234 Block: 291892197005003
235 Block: 291892197005004
236 Block: 291892197005005
237 Block: 291892197005006
238 Block: 291892197005007
239 Block: 291892197005008
240 Block: 291892197005010
241 Block: 291892197005011
242 Block: 291892197005012
243 Block: 291892197005013
244 VTD GRA015 Subtotal
245 VTD: GRA016
246 VTD: GRA018
247 VTD: GRA019

HB 1 9
248 Block: 291892197001024
249 Block: 291892197003006
250 Block: 291892197003007
251 Block: 291892197003008
252 Block: 291892197003009
253 Block: 291892197003010
254 Block: 291892197003011
255 Block: 291892197003012
256 Block: 291892197003013
257 Block: 291892197003014
258 Block: 291892197005002
259 Block: 291892197005014
260 Block: 291892197005015
261 Block: 291892198012001
262 Block: 291892198012002
263 Block: 291892198013017
264 VTD GRA019 Subtotal
265 VTD: GRA021
266 VTD: GRA022
267 VTD: GRA025
268 VTD: GRA033
269 Block: 291892199001000
270 Block: 291892199001001
271 Block: 291892199001002
272 Block: 291892199001003
273 Block: 291892199001004
274 Block: 291892199001005
275 Block: 291892199001006
276 Block: 291892199001008
277 Block: 291892199001009
278 VTD GRA033 Subtotal
279 VTD: GRA035
280 VTD: GRA039
281 VTD: GRA045
282 Block: 291892208011021
283 Block: 291892208011023
284 VTD GRA045 Subtotal

HB 1 10
285 VTD: GRA202
286 Block: 291892208011018
287 VTD GRA202 Subtotal
288 VTD: HAD001
289 VTD: HAD002
290 VTD: HAD003
291 VTD: HAD004
292 VTD: HAD005
293 VTD: HAD006
294 VTD: HAD007
295 VTD: HAD008
296 VTD: HAD009
297 VTD: HAD010
298 VTD: HAD011
299 VTD: HAD012
300 VTD: HAD013
301 VTD: HAD014
302 VTD: HAD015
303 VTD: HAD016
304 VTD: HAD017
305 VTD: HAD018
306 VTD: HAD019
307 VTD: HAD020
308 VTD: HAD021
309 VTD: HAD022
310 VTD: HAD023
311 VTD: HAD024
312 VTD: HAD025
313 VTD: HAD026
314 VTD: HAD027
315 VTD: HAD028
316 VTD: HAD029
317 VTD: HAD030
318 VTD: HAD031
319 VTD: HAD032
320 VTD: HAD033
321 VTD: HAD034

HB 1 11
322 VTD: HAD035
323 VTD: HAD200
324 VTD: JEF005
325 VTD: JEF006
326 VTD: JEF007
327 VTD: JEF008
328 VTD: JEF009
329 VTD: JEF010
330 Block: 291892194001026
331 Block: 291892194003018
332 Block: 291892194004000
333 Block: 291892194004001
334 Block: 291892194004002
335 Block: 291892194004003
336 Block: 291892194004004
337 Block: 291892194004005
338 Block: 291892194004006
339 Block: 291892194004007
340 Block: 291892194004008
341 Block: 291892194004010
342 Block: 291892194004011
343 Block: 291892194004012
344 Block: 291892194004013
345 Block: 291892194004014
346 Block: 291892194004015
347 Block: 291892194005001
348 Block: 291892194005002
349 Block: 291892194005005
350 Block: 291892194005006
351 Block: 291892194005007
352 Block: 291892194005015
353 Block: 291892194005016
354 Block: 291892194005017
355 Block: 291892194005018
356 Block: 291892194005019
357 Block: 291892194005020
358 Block: 291892194005021

HB 1 12
359 Block: 291892194005022
360 VTD JEF010 Subtotal
361 VTD: JEF011
362 VTD: JEF012
363 VTD: JEF013
364 VTD: JEF014
365 VTD: JEF015
366 VTD: JEF016
367 VTD: JEF017
368 VTD: JEF018
369 VTD: JEF019
370 VTD: JEF020
371 VTD: JEF021
372 VTD: JEF022
373 VTD: JEF023
374 VTD: JEF024
375 VTD: JEF025
376 VTD: JEF026
377 VTD: JEF027
378 VTD: JEF028
379 VTD: JEF029
380 VTD: JEF030
381 VTD: JEF031
382 VTD: JEF202
383 VTD: LC001
384 VTD: LC002
385 VTD: LC003
386 VTD: LC004
387 VTD: LC005
388 VTD: LC006
389 VTD: LC007
390 VTD: LC008
391 VTD: LC009
392 VTD: LC010
393 VTD: LC011
394 VTD: LC012
395 VTD: LC013

HB 1 13
396 VTD: LC014
397 VTD: LC015
398 VTD: LC016
399 VTD: LC017
400 VTD: LC018
401 VTD: LC019
402 VTD: LC020
403 VTD: LC021
404 VTD: LC022
405 VTD: LC023
406 VTD: LC024
407 VTD: LC025
408 VTD: LC026
409 VTD: LC027
410 VTD: LC028
411 VTD: LC029
412 VTD: LC030
413 VTD: LC031
414 VTD: LC032
415 VTD: LC033
416 VTD: LC200
417 VTD: LC203
418 VTD: LC204
419 VTD: LC209
420 VTD: MID001
421 VTD: MID002
422 VTD: MID003
423 VTD: MID004
424 VTD: MID005
425 VTD: MID006
426 VTD: MID007
427 VTD: MID008
428 VTD: MID009
429 VTD: MID010
430 VTD: MID011
431 VTD: MID012
432 VTD: MID013

HB 1 14
433 VTD: MID014
434 VTD: MID015
435 VTD: MID016
436 VTD: MID017
437 VTD: MID018
438 VTD: MID019
439 VTD: MID020
440 VTD: MID021
441 VTD: MID022
442 VTD: MID023
443 VTD: MID024
444 VTD: MID025
445 VTD: MID026
446 VTD: MID027
447 VTD: MID028
448 VTD: MID029
449 VTD: MID030
450 VTD: MID031
451 VTD: MID032
452 VTD: MID033
453 VTD: MID034
454 VTD: MID035
455 VTD: MID036
456 VTD: MID037
457 VTD: MID038
458 VTD: MID039
459 VTD: MID040
460 VTD: MID041
461 VTD: MID042
462 VTD: MID043
463 VTD: MID044
464 VTD: MID045
465 VTD: MID046
466 VTD: MID047
467 VTD: MID048
468 VTD: MID049
469 VTD: MID050

HB 1 15
470 VTD: MID051
471 VTD: MID052
472 VTD: MID053
473 VTD: MID054
474 VTD: MID055
475 VTD: MID056
476 VTD: MID057
477 VTD: MID058
478 VTD: MID059
479 VTD: MID060
480 VTD: MID061
481 VTD: MID200
482 VTD: MID201
483 VTD: MID202
484 VTD: MID204
485 VTD: NOR001
486 VTD: NOR002
487 VTD: NOR003
488 VTD: NOR004
489 VTD: NOR005
490 VTD: NOR006
491 VTD: NOR007
492 VTD: NOR008
493 VTD: NOR009
494 VTD: NOR010
495 VTD: NOR011
496 VTD: NOR012
497 VTD: NOR013
498 VTD: NOR014
499 VTD: NOR015
500 VTD: NOR016
501 VTD: NOR017
502 VTD: NOR018
503 VTD: NOR019
504 VTD: NOR020
505 VTD: NOR021
506 VTD: NOR022

HB 1 16
507 VTD: NOR023
508 VTD: NOR024
509 VTD: NOR025
510 VTD: NOR026
511 VTD: NOR027
512 VTD: NOR028
513 VTD: NOR029
514 VTD: NOR030
515 VTD: NOR031
516 VTD: NOR032
517 VTD: NOR033
518 VTD: NOR034
519 VTD: NOR035
520 VTD: NOR036
521 VTD: NOR037
522 VTD: NOR038
523 VTD: NOR039
524 VTD: NOR040
525 VTD: NOR041
526 VTD: NOR042
527 VTD: NOR043
528 VTD: NOR044
529 VTD: NOR045
530 VTD: NOR046
531 VTD: NOR047
532 VTD: NOR048
533 VTD: NOR049
534 VTD: NOR050
535 VTD: NOR051
536 VTD: NOR052
537 VTD: NOR053
538 VTD: NOR054
539 VTD: NOR055
540 VTD: NOR056
541 VTD: NOR200
542 VTD: NOR201
543 VTD: NOR202

HB 1 17
544 VTD: NOR203
545 VTD: NOR204
546 VTD: NOR208
547 VTD: NOR213
548 VTD: NOR218
549 VTD: NOR222
550 VTD: NRW001
551 VTD: NRW002
552 VTD: NRW003
553 VTD: NRW004
554 VTD: NRW005
555 VTD: NRW006
556 VTD: NRW007
557 VTD: NRW008
558 VTD: NRW009
559 VTD: NRW010
560 VTD: NRW011
561 VTD: NRW012
562 VTD: NRW013
563 VTD: NRW014
564 VTD: NRW015
565 VTD: NRW016
566 VTD: NRW017
567 VTD: NRW018
568 VTD: NRW019
569 VTD: NRW020
570 VTD: NRW021
571 VTD: NRW022
572 VTD: NRW023
573 VTD: NRW024
574 VTD: NRW025
575 VTD: NRW026
576 VTD: NRW027
577 VTD: NRW028
578 VTD: NRW029
579 VTD: NRW030
580 VTD: NRW031

HB 1 18
581 VTD: NRW032
582 VTD: NRW033
583 VTD: NRW034
584 VTD: NRW035
585 VTD: NRW036
586 VTD: NRW037
587 VTD: NRW038
588 VTD: NRW039
589 VTD: NRW040
590 VTD: NRW041
591 VTD: NRW042
592 VTD: NRW043
593 VTD: NRW044
594 VTD: NRW045
595 VTD: NRW046
596 VTD: NRW047
597 VTD: NRW048
598 VTD: NRW049
599 VTD: NRW050
600 VTD: NRW051
601 VTD: NRW200
602 VTD: NRW201
603 VTD: NRW202
604 VTD: NRW203
605 VTD: NRW204
606 VTD: NRW205
607 VTD: NW001
608 Block: 291892132023002
609 VTD NW001 Subtotal
610 VTD: NW002
611 VTD: NW003
612 VTD: NW004
613 VTD: NW005
614 VTD: NW006
615 VTD: NW007
616 VTD: NW008
617 VTD: NW009

HB 1 19
618 VTD: NW010
619 VTD: NW011
620 VTD: NW012
621 VTD: NW014
622 VTD: NW015
623 VTD: NW016
624 VTD: NW017
625 VTD: NW018
626 VTD: NW022
627 VTD: NW023
628 VTD: NW024
629 VTD: NW025
630 VTD: NW026
631 VTD: NW027
632 VTD: NW028
633 VTD: NW030
634 VTD: NW031
635 VTD: NW032
636 VTD: NW034
637 VTD: NW036
638 VTD: NW037
639 VTD: NW039
640 VTD: NW040
641 VTD: NW041
642 VTD: NW042
643 VTD: NW043
644 VTD: NW044
645 VTD: NW045
646 VTD: NW046
647 VTD: NW048
648 VTD: NW050
649 VTD: NW051
650 VTD: NW200
651 VTD: NW202
652 VTD: NW204
653 VTD: NW205
654 VTD: NW206

HB 1 20
655 VTD: NW207
656 VTD: NW208
657 VTD: NW209
658 VTD: NW210
659 VTD: NW212
660 VTD: NW213
661 VTD: NW214
662 VTD: NW215
663 VTD: NW216
664 VTD: NW217
665 VTD: NW219
666 VTD: NW220
667 Block: 291892132031024
668 VTD NW220 Subtotal
669 VTD: NW224
670 VTD: NW225
671 VTD: NW226
672 VTD: NW227
673 VTD: NW229
674 VTD: SF001
675 VTD: SF002
676 VTD: SF003
677 VTD: SF004
678 VTD: SF005
679 VTD: SF006
680 VTD: SF007
681 VTD: SF008
682 VTD: SF009
683 VTD: SF010
684 VTD: SF011
685 VTD: SF012
686 VTD: SF013
687 VTD: SF014
688 VTD: SF015
689 VTD: SF016
690 VTD: SF017
691 VTD: SF018

HB 1 21
692 VTD: SF019
693 VTD: SF020
694 VTD: SF021
695 VTD: SF022
696 VTD: SF023
697 VTD: SF024
698 VTD: SF025
699 VTD: SF026
700 VTD: SF027
701 VTD: SF028
702 VTD: SF029
703 VTD: SF030
704 VTD: SF031
705 VTD: SF032
706 VTD: SF033
707 VTD: SF034
708 VTD: SF035
709 VTD: SF200
710 VTD: SPL001
711 VTD: SPL002
712 VTD: SPL003
713 VTD: SPL004
714 VTD: SPL005
715 VTD: SPL006
716 VTD: SPL007
717 VTD: SPL008
718 VTD: SPL009
719 VTD: SPL010
720 VTD: SPL011
721 VTD: SPL012
722 VTD: SPL013
723 VTD: SPL014
724 VTD: SPL015
725 VTD: SPL016
726 VTD: SPL017
727 VTD: SPL018
728 VTD: SPL019

HB 1 22
729 VTD: SPL020
730 VTD: SPL021
731 VTD: SPL022
732 VTD: SPL023
733 VTD: SPL024
734 VTD: SPL025
735 VTD: SPL026
736 VTD: SPL027
737 VTD: SPL028
738 VTD: SPL201
739 VTD: SPL202
740 VTD: SPL207
741 VTD: SPL208
742 VTD: UNV001
743 VTD: UNV002
744 VTD: UNV003
745 VTD: UNV004
746 VTD: UNV005
747 VTD: UNV006
748 VTD: UNV007
749 VTD: UNV008
750 VTD: UNV009
751 VTD: UNV010
752 VTD: UNV011
753 VTD: UNV012
754 VTD: UNV013
755 VTD: UNV014
756 VTD: UNV015
757 VTD: UNV016
758 VTD: UNV017
759 VTD: UNV018
760 VTD: UNV019
761 VTD: UNV020
762 VTD: UNV021
763 VTD: UNV022
764 VTD: UNV023
765 VTD: UNV024

HB 1 23
766 VTD: UNV025
767 VTD: UNV026
768 VTD: UNV027
769 VTD: UNV028
770 VTD: UNV029
771 VTD: UNV030
772 VTD: UNV031
773 VTD: UNV032
774 VTD: UNV033
775 VTD: UNV034
776 VTD: UNV035
777 VTD: UNV036
778 VTD: UNV037
779 VTD: UNV038
780 VTD: UNV039
781 VTD: UNV040
782 VTD: UNV041
783 VTD: UNV042
784 VTD: UNV043
785 VTD: UNV045
786 VTD: UNV201
787 VTD: UNV202
788 VTD: UNV205
789 VTD: UNV206
790 VTD: UNV208
791 County St. Louis MO Subtotal
792 District 1 Total
128.472. The second congressional district shall be composed of the following:
2 County: Crawford MO
3 County: Franklin MO
4 County: Gasconade MO
5 County: Jefferson MO
6 VTD: Brennan
7 Block: 290997002111020
8 Block: 290997002111021
9 Block: 290997003032017
10 Block: 290997003051001

HB 1 24
11 Block: 290997003051003
12 Block: 290997003052001
13 Block: 290997003052002
14 Block: 290997003052003
15 Block: 290997003052004
16 Block: 290997003052005
17 Block: 290997003052025
18 VTD Brennan Subtotal
19 VTD: Byrnes Mill W-1
20 VTD: Byrnes Mill W-2
21 VTD: Byrnes Mill W-3
22 VTD: Byrnesville
23 VTD: Cedar Hill
24 VTD: Cedar Hill Lakes
25 VTD: De Soto W-1
26 VTD: De Soto W-2
27 VTD: De Soto W-3
28 VTD: De Soto W-4
29 VTD: Dulin Creek
30 VTD: Goldman
31 VTD: Grubville
32 VTD: Grubville 2
33 VTD: High Ridge
34 VTD: Hillsboro W-1
35 VTD: Hillsboro W-2
36 VTD: Hillsboro W-3
37 VTD: Hillsboro W-4
38 VTD: Hoene Springs
39 VTD: House Springs
40 VTD: Lake Tekawitha
41 VTD: Lake Tishomingo
42 VTD: Meramec Valley
43 VTD: North Jefferson
44 Block: 290997002062004
45 Block: 290997002062005
46 Block: 290997002072000
47 Block: 290997002072001

HB 1 25
48 Block: 290997002072002
49 Block: 290997002072003
50 Block: 290997002072004
51 Block: 290997002072005
52 Block: 290997002072006
53 Block: 290997002072007
54 Block: 290997002072008
55 Block: 290997002072009
56 Block: 290997002072010
57 Block: 290997002072011
58 Block: 290997002072012
59 Block: 290997002072013
60 Block: 290997002072014
61 Block: 290997002072017
62 Block: 290997002072018
63 Block: 290997002072019
64 Block: 290997002072020
65 Block: 290997002072021
66 Block: 290997002072022
67 Block: 290997002072023
68 Block: 290997002072024
69 Block: 290997002072025
70 Block: 290997002111019
71 Block: 290997002113004
72 Block: 290997002113005
73 Block: 290997002113006
74 Block: 290997002113007
75 Block: 290997002113008
76 Block: 290997002113009
77 Block: 290997002113012
78 Block: 290997002113013
79 Block: 290997002113014
80 Block: 290997002113015
81 Block: 290997002113016
82 Block: 290997002113017
83 Block: 290997002113019
84 Block: 290997003022000

HB 1 26
85 Block: 290997003022001
86 Block: 290997003022002
87 Block: 290997003022015
88 Block: 290997003023002
89 Block: 290997003063001
90 Block: 290997003063003
91 Block: 290997003063004
92 Block: 290997003063005
93 VTD North Jefferson Subtotal
94 VTD: Northwest
95 VTD: Parkdale
96 VTD: Peaceful Village
97 VTD: Raintree
98 VTD: Rockwood
99 VTD: Scotsdale
100 VTD: Valle
101 Block: 290997010023040
102 Block: 290997010023041
103 Block: 290997012006047
104 Block: 290997012006053
105 Block: 290997012006061
106 Block: 290997012006062
107 Block: 290997013001001
108 Block: 290997013001002
109 Block: 290997013001003
110 Block: 290997013001004
111 Block: 290997013001055
112 Block: 290997013001062
113 Block: 290997013001063
114 Block: 290997013001064
115 Block: 290997013001065
116 Block: 290997013001066
117 Block: 290997013001067
118 Block: 290997013001070
119 Block: 290997013001075
120 Block: 290997013001077
121 Block: 290997013003003

HB 1 27
122 Block: 290997013003013
123 Block: 290997013003014
124 Block: 290997013003015
125 Block: 290997013003017
126 Block: 290997013003018
127 Block: 290997013003019
128 Block: 290997013003021
129 Block: 290997013003022
130 Block: 290997014012008
131 Block: 290997014012009
132 Block: 290997014012017
133 Block: 290997014012021
134 Block: 290997014012022
135 Block: 290997014012023
136 Block: 290997014012064
137 Block: 290997014012065
138 Block: 290997014012066
139 Block: 290997014012067
140 VTD Valle Subtotal
141 VTD: Victoria
142 Block: 290997010011036
143 Block: 290997010013008
144 Block: 290997010013032
145 Block: 290997010013033
146 Block: 290997010021020
147 Block: 290997010021022
148 Block: 290997010021023
149 Block: 290997010021024
150 Block: 290997010022000
151 Block: 290997010022001
152 Block: 290997010022002
153 Block: 290997010022003
154 Block: 290997010022004
155 Block: 290997010022005
156 Block: 290997010022006
157 Block: 290997010022007
158 Block: 290997010022010

HB 1 28
159 Block: 290997010022011
160 Block: 290997010022012
161 Block: 290997010022017
162 Block: 290997010022018
163 Block: 290997010022020
164 Block: 290997010022021
165 Block: 290997010022022
166 Block: 290997010022024
167 Block: 290997010022025
168 Block: 290997010022026
169 Block: 290997010022027
170 Block: 290997010022029
171 Block: 290997010022030
172 Block: 290997010023007
173 Block: 290997010023008
174 Block: 290997010023009
175 Block: 290997010023010
176 Block: 290997010023011
177 Block: 290997010023014
178 Block: 290997010023015
179 Block: 290997010023016
180 Block: 290997010023017
181 Block: 290997010023018
182 Block: 290997010023022
183 Block: 290997010023023
184 Block: 290997010023024
185 Block: 290997010023025
186 Block: 290997010023026
187 Block: 290997010023027
188 Block: 290997010023028
189 Block: 290997010023032
190 Block: 290997010023033
191 Block: 290997010023034
192 Block: 290997010023036
193 Block: 290997010023037
194 Block: 290997012001000
195 Block: 290997012001028

HB 1 29
196 Block: 290997012001029
197 Block: 290997012001030
198 VTD Victoria Subtotal
199 VTD: Vineland
200 VTD: Ware
201 County Jefferson MO Subtotal
202 County: St. Louis MO
203 VTD: AP032
204 VTD: AP041
205 VTD: AP201
206 VTD: AP202
207 VTD: BON001
208 VTD: BON002
209 VTD: BON003
210 VTD: BON004
211 VTD: BON005
212 VTD: BON006
213 VTD: BON007
214 VTD: BON008
215 VTD: BON009
216 VTD: BON010
217 VTD: BON011
218 VTD: BON012
219 VTD: BON013
220 VTD: BON014
221 VTD: BON015
222 VTD: BON016
223 VTD: BON017
224 VTD: BON018
225 VTD: BON019
226 VTD: BON020
227 VTD: BON021
228 VTD: BON022
229 VTD: BON023
230 VTD: BON024
231 VTD: BON025
232 VTD: BON026

HB 1 30
233 VTD: BON027
234 VTD: BON028
235 VTD: BON029
236 VTD: BON030
237 VTD: BON031
238 VTD: BON032
239 VTD: BON033
240 VTD: BON034
241 VTD: BON035
242 VTD: BON036
243 VTD: BON037
244 VTD: BON038
245 VTD: BON039
246 VTD: BON040
247 VTD: BON200
248 VTD: BON202
249 VTD: BON203
250 VTD: BON205
251 VTD: BON206
252 VTD: BON207
253 VTD: BON208
254 VTD: BON210
255 VTD: BON211
256 VTD: CC001
257 VTD: CC002
258 VTD: CC003
259 VTD: CC004
260 VTD: CC005
261 VTD: CC006
262 VTD: CC007
263 VTD: CC008
264 VTD: CC009
265 VTD: CC010
266 VTD: CC011
267 VTD: CC014
268 VTD: CC015
269 VTD: CC016

HB 1 31
270 VTD: CC017
271 VTD: CC018
272 VTD: CC019
273 VTD: CC020
274 VTD: CC021
275 VTD: CC023
276 VTD: CC024
277 VTD: CC025
278 VTD: CC026
279 VTD: CC027
280 VTD: CC028
281 VTD: CC029
282 VTD: CC030
283 VTD: CC031
284 VTD: CC032
285 VTD: CC033
286 VTD: CC034
287 VTD: CC035
288 VTD: CC036
289 VTD: CC037
290 VTD: CC038
291 VTD: CC039
292 VTD: CC040
293 VTD: CC041
294 VTD: CC042
295 VTD: CC044
296 VTD: CC045
297 VTD: CC046
298 VTD: CC047
299 VTD: CC048
300 Block: 291892155001007
301 Block: 291892155004013
302 Block: 291892155004014
303 Block: 291892155004015
304 Block: 291892155004016
305 Block: 291892155004017
306 VTD CC048 Subtotal

HB 1 32
307 VTD: CC049
308 VTD: CC050
309 VTD: CC052
310 VTD: CC053
311 VTD: CC054
312 VTD: CC055
313 VTD: CC056
314 VTD: CC058
315 VTD: CC059
316 VTD: CC060
317 VTD: CC201
318 VTD: CC202
319 VTD: CC203
320 Block: 291892156001020
321 Block: 291892156001021
322 Block: 291892156001024
323 Block: 291892156001025
324 Block: 291892156001026
325 Block: 291892156001029
326 Block: 291892156001030
327 VTD CC203 Subtotal
328 VTD: CC208
329 VTD: CC214
330 VTD: CC221
331 VTD: CHE001
332 VTD: CHE002
333 VTD: CHE003
334 VTD: CHE004
335 VTD: CHE005
336 VTD: CHE006
337 VTD: CHE007
338 VTD: CHE008
339 VTD: CHE009
340 VTD: CHE010
341 VTD: CHE011
342 VTD: CHE012
343 VTD: CHE013

HB 1 33
344 VTD: CHE014
345 VTD: CHE015
346 VTD: CHE016
347 VTD: CHE017
348 VTD: CHE018
349 VTD: CHE019
350 VTD: CHE020
351 VTD: CHE021
352 VTD: CHE022
353 VTD: CHE023
354 VTD: CHE024
355 VTD: CHE025
356 VTD: CHE026
357 VTD: CHE027
358 VTD: CHE028
359 VTD: CHE029
360 VTD: CHE030
361 VTD: CHE031
362 VTD: CHE032
363 VTD: CHE033
364 VTD: CHE034
365 VTD: CHE035
366 VTD: CHE036
367 VTD: CHE037
368 VTD: CHE038
369 VTD: CHE039
370 VTD: CHE040
371 VTD: CHE041
372 VTD: CHE042
373 VTD: CHE043
374 VTD: CHE044
375 VTD: CHE045
376 VTD: CHE046
377 VTD: CHE047
378 VTD: CHE048
379 VTD: CHE049
380 VTD: CHE050

HB 1 34
381 VTD: CHE051
382 VTD: CHE052
383 VTD: CHE053
384 VTD: CHE054
385 VTD: CHE055
386 VTD: CHE057
387 VTD: CHE200
388 VTD: CHE203
389 VTD: CHE212
390 VTD: CHE214
391 VTD: CHE215
392 VTD: CLA004
393 Block: 291892154004014
394 VTD CLA004 Subtotal
395 VTD: CLA006
396 VTD: CLA007
397 VTD: CLA012
398 VTD: CLA013
399 Block: 291892154003013
400 Block: 291892154003014
401 Block: 291892154004000
402 Block: 291892154004001
403 Block: 291892154004002
404 Block: 291892154004003
405 Block: 291892154004004
406 Block: 291892154004008
407 Block: 291892154004012
408 Block: 291892154004013
409 Block: 291892154005001
410 Block: 291892154005002
411 Block: 291892154005003
412 VTD CLA013 Subtotal
413 VTD: CLA014
414 VTD: CLA015
415 VTD: CLA016
416 VTD: CLA024
417 VTD: CLA025

HB 1 35
418 VTD: CLA026
419 VTD: CLA028
420 VTD: CLA033
421 VTD: CLA034
422 VTD: CLA036
423 VTD: CLA037
424 VTD: CLA040
425 VTD: CLA042
426 VTD: CLA045
427 VTD: CLA047
428 VTD: CLA049
429 VTD: CLA201
430 VTD: CLA202
431 VTD: CLA203
432 VTD: CLA205
433 VTD: CON001
434 VTD: CON002
435 VTD: CON003
436 VTD: CON004
437 VTD: CON005
438 VTD: CON006
439 VTD: CON007
440 VTD: CON008
441 VTD: CON009
442 VTD: CON010
443 VTD: CON011
444 VTD: CON012
445 VTD: CON013
446 VTD: CON014
447 VTD: CON015
448 VTD: CON016
449 VTD: CON017
450 VTD: CON018
451 VTD: CON019
452 VTD: CON020
453 VTD: CON021
454 VTD: CON022

HB 1 36
455 VTD: CON023
456 VTD: CON024
457 VTD: CON025
458 VTD: CON026
459 VTD: CON027
460 VTD: CON028
461 VTD: CON029
462 VTD: CON030
463 VTD: CON031
464 VTD: CON032
465 VTD: CON033
466 VTD: CON034
467 VTD: CON035
468 VTD: CON036
469 VTD: CON037
470 VTD: CON038
471 VTD: CON039
472 VTD: CON040
473 VTD: CON041
474 VTD: CON042
475 VTD: CON043
476 VTD: CON044
477 VTD: CON045
478 VTD: CON046
479 VTD: CON047
480 VTD: CON048
481 VTD: CON049
482 VTD: CON050
483 VTD: CON051
484 VTD: CON052
485 VTD: CON053
486 VTD: CON200
487 VTD: CON202
488 VTD: CON204
489 VTD: CON205
490 VTD: CON206
491 VTD: CON212

HB 1 37
492 VTD: CON213
493 VTD: GRA001
494 VTD: GRA002
495 VTD: GRA003
496 VTD: GRA004
497 VTD: GRA005
498 VTD: GRA006
499 VTD: GRA007
500 Block: 291892198011021
501 Block: 291892198012003
502 Block: 291892198012006
503 Block: 291892198012007
504 Block: 291892198012008
505 Block: 291892198012009
506 Block: 291892198012010
507 Block: 291892198012011
508 Block: 291892198012012
509 VTD GRA007 Subtotal
510 VTD: GRA008
511 VTD: GRA009
512 VTD: GRA010
513 VTD: GRA011
514 VTD: GRA012
515 VTD: GRA013
516 VTD: GRA014
517 VTD: GRA015
518 Block: 291892197004003
519 Block: 291892197004004
520 Block: 291892197004005
521 Block: 291892197004006
522 Block: 291892197004007
523 Block: 291892197004008
524 Block: 291892197004009
525 Block: 291892208013000
526 Block: 291892208013001
527 Block: 291892208013002
528 Block: 291892208013003

HB 1 38
529 Block: 291892208013004
530 Block: 291892208013005
531 Block: 291892208013006
532 Block: 291892208013007
533 Block: 291892208013008
534 Block: 291892208013009
535 VTD GRA015 Subtotal
536 VTD: GRA017
537 VTD: GRA019
538 Block: 291892197004000
539 Block: 291892197004001
540 Block: 291892197004002
541 Block: 291892197004010
542 Block: 291892197004011
543 Block: 291892197004012
544 Block: 291892198012004
545 Block: 291892198012005
546 VTD GRA019 Subtotal
547 VTD: GRA020
548 VTD: GRA023
549 VTD: GRA024
550 VTD: GRA026
551 VTD: GRA027
552 VTD: GRA028
553 VTD: GRA029
554 VTD: GRA030
555 VTD: GRA031
556 VTD: GRA032
557 VTD: GRA033
558 Block: 291892199001007
559 Block: 291892199004000
560 Block: 291892199004001
561 Block: 291892199004002
562 Block: 291892199004003
563 Block: 291892199004004
564 VTD GRA033 Subtotal
565 VTD: GRA034

HB 1 39
566 VTD: GRA036
567 VTD: GRA037
568 VTD: GRA038
569 VTD: GRA040
570 VTD: GRA041
571 VTD: GRA042
572 VTD: GRA043
573 VTD: GRA044
574 VTD: GRA045
575 Block: 291892208011022
576 VTD GRA045 Subtotal
577 VTD: GRA046
578 VTD: GRA047
579 VTD: GRA048
580 VTD: GRA201
581 VTD: GRA202
582 Block: 291892208011017
583 VTD GRA202 Subtotal
584 VTD: GRA206
585 VTD: GRA209
586 VTD: GRA210
587 VTD: JEF001
588 VTD: JEF002
589 VTD: JEF003
590 VTD: JEF004
591 VTD: JEF010
592 Block: 291892219001008
593 VTD JEF010 Subtotal
594 VTD: JEF032
595 VTD: JEF033
596 VTD: JEF034
597 VTD: JEF035
598 VTD: JEF036
599 VTD: JEF037
600 VTD: JEF200
601 VTD: LAF001
602 VTD: LAF002

HB 1 40
603 VTD: LAF003
604 VTD: LAF004
605 VTD: LAF005
606 VTD: LAF006
607 VTD: LAF007
608 VTD: LAF008
609 VTD: LAF009
610 VTD: LAF010
611 VTD: LAF011
612 VTD: LAF012
613 VTD: LAF013
614 VTD: LAF014
615 VTD: LAF015
616 VTD: LAF016
617 VTD: LAF017
618 VTD: LAF018
619 VTD: LAF019
620 VTD: LAF020
621 VTD: LAF022
622 VTD: LAF023
623 VTD: LAF024
624 VTD: LAF025
625 VTD: LAF026
626 VTD: LAF027
627 VTD: LAF028
628 VTD: LAF029
629 VTD: LAF030
630 VTD: LAF031
631 VTD: LAF032
632 VTD: LAF033
633 VTD: LAF034
634 VTD: LAF035
635 VTD: LAF036
636 VTD: LAF037
637 VTD: LAF038
638 VTD: LAF039
639 VTD: LAF040

HB 1 41
640 VTD: LAF041
641 VTD: LAF042
642 VTD: LAF043
643 VTD: LAF044
644 VTD: LAF045
645 VTD: LAF046
646 VTD: LAF200
647 VTD: LAF205
648 VTD: LAF207
649 VTD: LEM001
650 VTD: LEM002
651 VTD: LEM003
652 VTD: LEM004
653 VTD: LEM005
654 VTD: LEM006
655 VTD: LEM007
656 VTD: LEM008
657 VTD: LEM009
658 VTD: LEM010
659 VTD: LEM011
660 VTD: LEM012
661 VTD: LEM013
662 VTD: LEM014
663 VTD: LEM015
664 VTD: LEM016
665 VTD: LEM017
666 VTD: LEM018
667 VTD: LEM019
668 VTD: LEM020
669 VTD: LEM021
670 VTD: LEM022
671 VTD: LEM023
672 VTD: LEM024
673 VTD: LEM025
674 VTD: LEM026
675 VTD: LEM027
676 VTD: LEM028

HB 1 42
677 VTD: LEM029
678 VTD: LEM030
679 VTD: LEM031
680 VTD: LEM032
681 VTD: LEM033
682 VTD: LEM200
683 VTD: LEM201
684 VTD: LEM202
685 VTD: LEM204
686 VTD: LEM205
687 VTD: LEM208
688 VTD: MER001
689 VTD: MER002
690 VTD: MER003
691 VTD: MER004
692 VTD: MER005
693 VTD: MER006
694 VTD: MER007
695 VTD: MER008
696 VTD: MER009
697 VTD: MER010
698 VTD: MER011
699 VTD: MER012
700 VTD: MER013
701 VTD: MER014
702 VTD: MER015
703 VTD: MER016
704 VTD: MER017
705 VTD: MER018
706 VTD: MER019
707 VTD: MER020
708 VTD: MER021
709 VTD: MER022
710 VTD: MER023
711 VTD: MER024
712 VTD: MER025
713 VTD: MER026

HB 1 43
714 VTD: MER027
715 VTD: MER028
716 VTD: MER029
717 VTD: MER030
718 VTD: MER031
719 VTD: MER032
720 VTD: MER033
721 VTD: MER034
722 VTD: MER035
723 VTD: MER036
724 VTD: MER037
725 VTD: MER038
726 VTD: MER039
727 VTD: MER040
728 VTD: MER041
729 VTD: MER042
730 VTD: MER043
731 VTD: MER044
732 VTD: MER045
733 VTD: MER046
734 VTD: MER047
735 VTD: MER048
736 VTD: MER200
737 VTD: MER202
738 VTD: MER204
739 VTD: MER207
740 VTD: MER209
741 VTD: MER210
742 VTD: MER213
743 VTD: MER214
744 VTD: MER215
745 VTD: MER219
746 VTD: MHT001
747 VTD: MHT002
748 VTD: MHT003
749 VTD: MHT004
750 VTD: MHT005

HB 1 44
751 VTD: MHT006
752 VTD: MHT007
753 VTD: MHT008
754 VTD: MHT009
755 VTD: MHT010
756 VTD: MHT011
757 VTD: MHT012
758 VTD: MHT013
759 VTD: MHT014
760 VTD: MHT015
761 VTD: MHT016
762 VTD: MHT017
763 VTD: MHT018
764 VTD: MHT019
765 VTD: MHT020
766 VTD: MHT021
767 VTD: MHT022
768 VTD: MHT023
769 VTD: MHT024
770 VTD: MHT025
771 VTD: MHT026
772 VTD: MHT027
773 VTD: MHT028
774 VTD: MHT029
775 VTD: MHT030
776 VTD: MHT031
777 VTD: MHT032
778 VTD: MHT033
779 VTD: MHT034
780 VTD: MHT035
781 VTD: MHT036
782 VTD: MHT037
783 VTD: MHT038
784 VTD: MHT039
785 VTD: MHT040
786 VTD: MHT041
787 VTD: MHT042

HB 1 45
788 VTD: MHT043
789 VTD: MHT044
790 VTD: MHT045
791 VTD: MHT046
792 VTD: MHT047
793 VTD: MHT048
794 VTD: MHT049
795 VTD: MHT050
796 VTD: MHT051
797 VTD: MHT052
798 VTD: MHT053
799 VTD: MHT054
800 VTD: MHT055
801 VTD: MHT056
802 VTD: MHT057
803 VTD: MHT058
804 VTD: MHT059
805 VTD: MHT200
806 VTD: MHT203
807 VTD: MHT206
808 VTD: MHT207
809 VTD: MHT208
810 VTD: MHT211
811 VTD: MHT212
812 VTD: MHT213
813 VTD: MHT214
814 VTD: MHT216
815 VTD: MHT219
816 VTD: MHT220
817 VTD: MHT222
818 VTD: MHT223
819 VTD: MR001
820 VTD: MR002
821 VTD: MR003
822 VTD: MR004
823 VTD: MR005
824 VTD: MR006

HB 1 46
825 VTD: MR007
826 VTD: MR008
827 VTD: MR009
828 VTD: MR010
829 VTD: MR011
830 VTD: MR012
831 VTD: MR013
832 VTD: MR014
833 VTD: MR015
834 VTD: MR016
835 VTD: MR017
836 VTD: MR018
837 VTD: MR019
838 VTD: MR020
839 VTD: MR021
840 VTD: MR022
841 VTD: MR023
842 VTD: MR024
843 VTD: MR025
844 VTD: MR026
845 VTD: MR027
846 VTD: MR028
847 VTD: MR029
848 VTD: MR030
849 VTD: MR031
850 VTD: MR032
851 VTD: MR033
852 VTD: MR034
853 VTD: MR035
854 VTD: MR036
855 VTD: MR037
856 VTD: MR038
857 VTD: MR039
858 VTD: MR040
859 VTD: MR041
860 VTD: MR042
861 VTD: MR043

HB 1 47
862 VTD: MR044
863 VTD: MR045
864 VTD: MR046
865 VTD: MR047
866 VTD: MR048
867 VTD: MR049
868 VTD: MR050
869 VTD: MR051
870 VTD: MR052
871 VTD: MR053
872 VTD: MR054
873 VTD: MR055
874 VTD: MR056
875 VTD: MR057
876 VTD: MR058
877 VTD: MR059
878 VTD: MR200
879 VTD: MR202
880 VTD: MR203
881 VTD: MR204
882 VTD: MR205
883 VTD: MR209
884 VTD: MR210
885 VTD: MR212
886 VTD: MR213
887 VTD: NW001
888 Block: 291892132023003
889 Block: 291892132023004
890 Block: 291892132023005
891 Block: 291892132023006
892 Block: 291892132023007
893 Block: 291892132023008
894 Block: 291892132023009
895 Block: 291892132025008
896 Block: 291892132025009
897 Block: 291892132025010
898 Block: 291892132025011

HB 1 48
899 Block: 291892132025012
900 Block: 291892132025013
901 Block: 291892132025014
902 Block: 291892132025015
903 VTD NW001 Subtotal
904 VTD: NW013
905 Block: 291892151431031
906 Block: 291892151431044
907 Block: 291892151431045
908 Block: 291892151431046
909 Block: 291892151431047
910 Block: 291892151431049
911 Block: 291892151431050
912 Block: 291892151431052
913 Block: 291892151431055
914 Block: 291892151431056
915 Block: 291892151431057
916 Block: 291892151431063
917 VTD NW013 Subtotal
918 VTD: NW019
919 VTD: NW020
920 VTD: NW029
921 VTD: NW033
922 VTD: NW035
923 Block: 291892151432000
924 Block: 291892151432011
925 Block: 291892151432012
926 Block: 291892151432013
927 Block: 291892151432017
928 Block: 291892151432018
929 Block: 291892151432019
930 Block: 291892151432020
931 Block: 291892151432021
932 Block: 291892151432022
933 Block: 291892151432023
934 VTD NW035 Subtotal
935 VTD: NW038

HB 1 49
936 VTD: NW047
937 VTD: NW049
938 VTD: NW052
939 VTD: NW201
940 VTD: NW211
941 VTD: OAK001
942 VTD: OAK002
943 VTD: OAK003
944 VTD: OAK004
945 VTD: OAK005
946 VTD: OAK006
947 VTD: OAK007
948 VTD: OAK008
949 VTD: OAK009
950 VTD: OAK010
951 VTD: OAK011
952 VTD: OAK012
953 VTD: OAK013
954 VTD: OAK014
955 VTD: OAK015
956 VTD: OAK016
957 VTD: OAK017
958 VTD: OAK018
959 VTD: OAK019
960 VTD: OAK020
961 VTD: OAK021
962 VTD: OAK022
963 VTD: OAK023
964 VTD: OAK024
965 VTD: OAK025
966 VTD: OAK026
967 VTD: OAK027
968 VTD: OAK028
969 VTD: OAK029
970 VTD: QUE001
971 VTD: QUE002
972 VTD: QUE003

HB 1 50
973 VTD: QUE004
974 VTD: QUE005
975 VTD: QUE006
976 VTD: QUE007
977 VTD: QUE008
978 VTD: QUE009
979 VTD: QUE010
980 VTD: QUE011
981 VTD: QUE012
982 VTD: QUE013
983 VTD: QUE014
984 VTD: QUE015
985 VTD: QUE016
986 VTD: QUE017
987 VTD: QUE018
988 VTD: QUE019
989 VTD: QUE020
990 VTD: QUE021
991 VTD: QUE022
992 VTD: QUE023
993 VTD: QUE024
994 VTD: QUE025
995 VTD: QUE026
996 VTD: QUE027
997 VTD: QUE028
998 VTD: QUE029
999 VTD: QUE030
1000 VTD: QUE031
1001 VTD: QUE032
1002 VTD: QUE033
1003 VTD: QUE034
1004 VTD: QUE035
1005 VTD: QUE036
1006 VTD: QUE037
1007 VTD: QUE038
1008 VTD: QUE039
1009 VTD: QUE040

HB 1 51
1010 VTD: QUE041
1011 VTD: QUE042
1012 VTD: QUE043
1013 VTD: QUE044
1014 VTD: QUE045
1015 VTD: QUE046
1016 VTD: QUE047
1017 VTD: QUE048
1018 VTD: QUE049
1019 VTD: QUE200
1020 VTD: QUE201
1021 VTD: QUE202
1022 VTD: QUE203
1023 VTD: QUE204
1024 VTD: QUE205
1025 VTD: QUE207
1026 VTD: QUE208
1027 VTD: QUE209
1028 VTD: QUE210
1029 VTD: QUE211
1030 VTD: QUE213
1031 VTD: TSF001
1032 VTD: TSF002
1033 VTD: TSF003
1034 VTD: TSF004
1035 VTD: TSF005
1036 VTD: TSF006
1037 VTD: TSF007
1038 VTD: TSF008
1039 VTD: TSF009
1040 VTD: TSF010
1041 VTD: TSF011
1042 VTD: TSF012
1043 VTD: TSF013
1044 VTD: TSF014
1045 VTD: TSF015
1046 VTD: TSF016

HB 1 52
1047 VTD: TSF017
1048 VTD: TSF018
1049 VTD: TSF019
1050 VTD: TSF020
1051 VTD: TSF021
1052 VTD: TSF022
1053 VTD: TSF023
1054 VTD: TSF024
1055 VTD: TSF025
1056 VTD: TSF026
1057 VTD: TSF027
1058 VTD: TSF201
1059 VTD: WH001
1060 VTD: WH002
1061 VTD: WH003
1062 VTD: WH004
1063 VTD: WH005
1064 VTD: WH006
1065 VTD: WH007
1066 VTD: WH008
1067 VTD: WH009
1068 VTD: WH010
1069 VTD: WH011
1070 VTD: WH012
1071 VTD: WH013
1072 VTD: WH014
1073 VTD: WH015
1074 VTD: WH016
1075 VTD: WH017
1076 VTD: WH018
1077 VTD: WH019
1078 VTD: WH020
1079 VTD: WH021
1080 VTD: WH022
1081 VTD: WH023
1082 VTD: WH024
1083 VTD: WH025

HB 1 53
1084 VTD: WH026
1085 VTD: WH027
1086 VTD: WH028
1087 VTD: WH029
1088 VTD: WH030
1089 VTD: WH031
1090 VTD: WH032
1091 VTD: WH033
1092 VTD: WH034
1093 VTD: WH035
1094 VTD: WH036
1095 VTD: WH037
1096 VTD: WH038
1097 VTD: WH039
1098 VTD: WH040
1099 VTD: WH041
1100 VTD: WH042
1101 VTD: WH043
1102 VTD: WH044
1103 VTD: WH045
1104 VTD: WH046
1105 VTD: WH047
1106 VTD: WH200
1107 VTD: WH201
1108 VTD: WH202
1109 VTD: WH203
1110 VTD: WH208
1111 County St. Louis MO Subtotal
1112 County: Washington MO
1113 District 2 Total
128.473. The third congressional district shall be composed of the following:
2 District 3
3 County: Audrain MO
4 County: Boone MO
5 VTD: 17
6 Block: 290190015062014
7 Block: 290190015062023

HB 1 54
8 Block: 290190015062031
9 VTD 17 Subtotal
10 VTD: 1A
11 VTD: 1B
12 VTD: 1C
13 VTD: 1D
14 VTD: 1E
15 VTD: 1F
16 VTD: 1G
17 VTD: 1I
18 VTD: 1J
19 VTD: 1K
20 VTD: 1L
21 VTD: 1M
22 VTD: 20
23 Block: 290190014024009
24 Block: 290190014024010
25 VTD 20 Subtotal
26 VTD: 21
27 Block: 290190013003006
28 Block: 290190013003008
29 Block: 290190013003009
30 Block: 290190013003023
31 Block: 290190018061001
32 Block: 290190018061002
33 Block: 290190018061003
34 Block: 290190018061004
35 Block: 290190018061008
36 Block: 290190018061009
37 Block: 290190018061010
38 Block: 290190018061011
39 Block: 290190018061012
40 Block: 290190018061016
41 Block: 290190018061017
42 VTD 21 Subtotal
43 VTD: 22
44 Block: 290190014013035

HB 1 55
45 Block: 290190014013036
46 Block: 290190014013041
47 Block: 290190014013045
48 Block: 290190014013046
49 VTD 22 Subtotal
50 VTD: 23
51 VTD: 24
52 VTD: 25
53 VTD: 26
54 VTD: 27
55 VTD: 28
56 VTD: 29
57 VTD: 2A
58 VTD: 2B
59 VTD: 2C
60 VTD: 2D
61 VTD: 2F
62 VTD: 2G
63 VTD: 2H
64 VTD: 2I
65 Block: 290190014011007
66 Block: 290190014011008
67 Block: 290190014011009
68 Block: 290190014011010
69 Block: 290190014011011
70 Block: 290190014011012
71 Block: 290190014011013
72 Block: 290190014011014
73 Block: 290190014011015
74 Block: 290190014011016
75 Block: 290190014011017
76 Block: 290190014011018
77 Block: 290190014011019
78 Block: 290190014011020
79 Block: 290190014012014
80 Block: 290190014012017
81 Block: 290190014012022

HB 1 56
82 Block: 290190014012023
83 Block: 290190014012024
84 Block: 290190014012025
85 Block: 290190014012026
86 Block: 290190014012029
87 Block: 290190014012030
88 Block: 290190014013007
89 Block: 290190014013008
90 Block: 290190014013009
91 Block: 290190014013010
92 Block: 290190014013011
93 Block: 290190014013013
94 Block: 290190014013014
95 Block: 290190014013015
96 Block: 290190014013016
97 Block: 290190014013018
98 Block: 290190014013019
99 Block: 290190014013020
100 Block: 290190014013021
101 Block: 290190014013022
102 Block: 290190014013023
103 Block: 290190014013024
104 Block: 290190014013034
105 Block: 290190014013037
106 Block: 290190014013038
107 Block: 290190014013039
108 Block: 290190014013040
109 Block: 290190014013042
110 Block: 290190014013043
111 Block: 290190014013044
112 Block: 290190014013047
113 Block: 290190014013052
114 Block: 290190014013058
115 Block: 290190015033022
116 VTD 2I Subtotal
117 VTD: 2J
118 VTD: 2K

HB 1 57
119 Block: 290190013003002
120 Block: 290190013003005
121 Block: 290190013003007
122 Block: 290190013003010
123 Block: 290190013003024
124 Block: 290190013003025
125 Block: 290190013003026
126 Block: 290190013003027
127 VTD 2K Subtotal
128 VTD: 2L
129 VTD: 30
130 VTD: 31
131 VTD: 32
132 VTD: 33
133 VTD: 34
134 VTD: 35
135 VTD: 36
136 VTD: 37
137 Block: 290190018062044
138 Block: 290190018062048
139 Block: 290190018062049
140 Block: 290190018062053
141 VTD 37 Subtotal
142 VTD: 3A
143 Block: 290190015031010
144 Block: 290190015031011
145 Block: 290190015031014
146 Block: 290190015031015
147 Block: 290190015031016
148 Block: 290190015031017
149 Block: 290190015031018
150 Block: 290190015031019
151 Block: 290190015031020
152 Block: 290190015032000
153 Block: 290190015032003
154 Block: 290190015032004
155 Block: 290190015032005

HB 1 58
156 Block: 290190015032006
157 Block: 290190015032007
158 Block: 290190015032008
159 Block: 290190015032009
160 Block: 290190015032010
161 Block: 290190015032011
162 Block: 290190015032012
163 Block: 290190015032013
164 Block: 290190015032014
165 Block: 290190015062027
166 Block: 290190015062028
167 Block: 290190015062032
168 Block: 290190015073001
169 Block: 290190015073002
170 Block: 290190015073003
171 Block: 290190015073006
172 Block: 290190015073007
173 Block: 290190015073008
174 Block: 290190015073009
175 Block: 290190015073010
176 Block: 290190015073011
177 Block: 290190015081002
178 Block: 290190015081003
179 Block: 290190015081017
180 Block: 290190015081018
181 Block: 290190015081019
182 Block: 290190015081020
183 Block: 290190015081024
184 Block: 290190015081025
185 Block: 290190015081026
186 Block: 290190015081027
187 Block: 290190015081028
188 Block: 290190015081029
189 Block: 290190015081030
190 VTD 3A Subtotal
191 VTD: 3B
192 Block: 290190015032001

HB 1 59
193 Block: 290190015032002
194 Block: 290190015052002
195 Block: 290190015052003
196 Block: 290190015061000
197 Block: 290190015061001
198 Block: 290190015061002
199 Block: 290190015061003
200 Block: 290190015061004
201 Block: 290190015061005
202 Block: 290190015061006
203 Block: 290190015061007
204 Block: 290190015061008
205 Block: 290190015061009
206 Block: 290190015061010
207 Block: 290190015061011
208 Block: 290190015061012
209 Block: 290190015061013
210 Block: 290190015061014
211 Block: 290190015061015
212 Block: 290190015061016
213 Block: 290190015061017
214 Block: 290190015061018
215 Block: 290190015061019
216 Block: 290190015061020
217 Block: 290190015061021
218 Block: 290190015061022
219 Block: 290190015061023
220 Block: 290190015061027
221 Block: 290190015061030
222 Block: 290190015062005
223 Block: 290190015062013
224 Block: 290190015062015
225 Block: 290190015062016
226 Block: 290190015062022
227 Block: 290190015062024
228 Block: 290190015062026
229 Block: 290190015062029

HB 1 60
230 Block: 290190015062033
231 Block: 290190015062034
232 Block: 290190015062035
233 Block: 290190015062036
234 Block: 290190015062037
235 Block: 290190015062038
236 Block: 290190015062039
237 Block: 290190015062040
238 Block: 290190015062041
239 Block: 290190015062042
240 Block: 290190015062043
241 Block: 290190015062044
242 Block: 290190015062045
243 Block: 290190015062046
244 Block: 290190015071022
245 Block: 290190015071023
246 Block: 290190015071024
247 Block: 290190015073004
248 Block: 290190015073005
249 Block: 290190015073012
250 Block: 290190016031015
251 Block: 290190016031016
252 VTD 3B Subtotal
253 VTD: 3C
254 VTD: 3D
255 VTD: 3E
256 VTD: 3F
257 VTD: 3G
258 VTD: 3H
259 VTD: 3I
260 VTD: 3J
261 VTD: 3L
262 VTD: 3M
263 VTD: 3N
264 VTD: 40
265 Block: 290190015081004
266 Block: 290190015081005

HB 1 61
267 Block: 290190015083016
268 Block: 290190015083024
269 VTD 40 Subtotal
270 VTD: 41
271 VTD: 42
272 VTD: 43
273 VTD: 44
274 VTD: 45
275 Block: 290190015033036
276 Block: 290190015033037
277 Block: 290190015083007
278 Block: 290190015083008
279 VTD 45 Subtotal
280 VTD: 4A
281 VTD: 4B
282 Block: 290190012013004
283 Block: 290190012013005
284 Block: 290190012013006
285 Block: 290190012013007
286 Block: 290190012013008
287 Block: 290190012013034
288 Block: 290190012014018
289 VTD 4B Subtotal
290 VTD: 4C
291 VTD: 4D
292 VTD: 4E
293 VTD: 4F
294 VTD: 4G
295 VTD: 4H
296 VTD: 4I
297 VTD: 4J
298 VTD: 4K
299 Block: 290190018061000
300 Block: 290190018061005
301 Block: 290190018061006
302 Block: 290190018061013
303 Block: 290190018063001

HB 1 62
304 Block: 290190018071017
305 Block: 290190018071018
306 Block: 290190018071021
307 Block: 290190018071029
308 Block: 290190018071030
309 Block: 290190018071031
310 Block: 290190018072024
311 Block: 290190018072025
312 Block: 290190018072028
313 Block: 290190018072029
314 Block: 290190018072030
315 Block: 290190018072031
316 Block: 290190018072032
317 Block: 290190018072033
318 Block: 290190018072034
319 Block: 290190018072035
320 Block: 290190018072036
321 Block: 290190018072037
322 VTD 4K Subtotal
323 VTD: 4L
324 Block: 290190012013009
325 Block: 290190012013010
326 Block: 290190012013011
327 Block: 290190012014002
328 Block: 290190012014003
329 Block: 290190012014004
330 Block: 290190012014005
331 Block: 290190012014006
332 Block: 290190012014007
333 Block: 290190012014008
334 Block: 290190012014009
335 Block: 290190012014010
336 Block: 290190012014011
337 Block: 290190012014012
338 Block: 290190012014013
339 Block: 290190012014014
340 Block: 290190012014019

HB 1 63
341 Block: 290190012014020
342 Block: 290190012014021
343 Block: 290190012014022
344 Block: 290190012014023
345 Block: 290190012014024
346 Block: 290190012014025
347 Block: 290190012014026
348 VTD 4L Subtotal
349 VTD: 4M
350 VTD: 5A
351 VTD: 5B
352 VTD: 5C
353 VTD: 5D
354 VTD: 5E
355 VTD: 5F
356 VTD: 5G
357 VTD: 5H
358 VTD: 5I
359 VTD: 5J
360 VTD: 5K
361 VTD: 5L
362 VTD: 5M
363 VTD: 5N
364 VTD: 5P
365 VTD: 6A
366 VTD: 6B
367 VTD: 6C
368 VTD: 6D
369 VTD: 6E
370 VTD: 6F
371 VTD: 6G
372 VTD: 6H
373 VTD: 6I
374 VTD: 6J
375 VTD: 6K
376 VTD: 6L
377 VTD: 6M

HB 1 64
378 County Boone MO Subtotal
379 County: Callaway MO
380 County: Lincoln MO
381 County: Monroe MO
382 County: Montgomery MO
383 County: Pike MO
384 County: Ralls MO
385 County: St. Charles MO
386 County: St. Louis MO
387 VTD: NW013
388 Block: 291892151431003
389 Block: 291892151431005
390 Block: 291892151431006
391 Block: 291892151431007
392 Block: 291892151431008
393 Block: 291892151431009
394 Block: 291892151431010
395 Block: 291892151431011
396 Block: 291892151431012
397 Block: 291892151431013
398 Block: 291892151431014
399 Block: 291892151431015
400 Block: 291892151431016
401 Block: 291892151431019
402 Block: 291892151431020
403 Block: 291892151431021
404 Block: 291892151431024
405 Block: 291892151431025
406 Block: 291892151431026
407 Block: 291892151431027
408 Block: 291892151431029
409 Block: 291892151431030
410 Block: 291892151431033
411 Block: 291892151431048
412 Block: 291892151431051
413 Block: 291892151431053
414 Block: 291892151431054

HB 1 65
415 Block: 291892151431064
416 VTD NW013 Subtotal
417 VTD: NW021
418 VTD: NW035
419 Block: 291892151432001
420 Block: 291892151432002
421 Block: 291892151432003
422 Block: 291892151432004
423 Block: 291892151432005
424 Block: 291892151432006
425 Block: 291892151432007
426 Block: 291892151432008
427 Block: 291892151432009
428 Block: 291892151432010
429 Block: 291892151432014
430 Block: 291892151432015
431 Block: 291892151432016
432 VTD NW035 Subtotal
433 VTD: NW203
434 VTD: NW220
435 Block: 291892132031027
436 VTD NW220 Subtotal
437 County St. Louis MO Subtotal
438 County: Warren MO
439 District 3 Total
128.474. The fourth congressional district shall be composed of the following:
2 County: Barton MO
3 County: Bates MO
4 County: Benton MO
5 County: Camden MO
6 County: Cass MO
7 County: Cedar MO
8 County: Dade MO
9 County: Dallas MO
10 County: Henry MO
11 County: Hickory MO
12 County: Jackson MO

HB 1 66
13 VTD: 412
14 VTD: 413
15 VTD: 414
16 VTD: 415
17 VTD: 616
18 VTD: 617
19 VTD: 618
20 VTD: 619
21 VTD: KC 1001
22 VTD: KC 1002
23 VTD: KC 1003
24 VTD: KC 1004
25 Block: 290950100021002
26 Block: 290950100021008
27 Block: 290950100021014
28 VTD KC 1004 Subtotal
29 VTD: KC 1005
30 VTD: KC 1006
31 VTD: KC 1007
32 VTD: KC 1008
33 Block: 290950100022004
34 Block: 290950100022008
35 Block: 290950100022011
36 VTD KC 1008 Subtotal
37 VTD: KC 1009
38 Block: 290950100022002
39 Block: 290950100022003
40 Block: 290950100023000
41 Block: 290950100023001
42 Block: 290950100023002
43 Block: 290950100023003
44 Block: 290950100023004
45 Block: 290950100023005
46 Block: 290950100023006
47 VTD KC 1009 Subtotal
48 VTD: KC 101
49 VTD: KC 1010

HB 1 67
50 VTD: KC 1011
51 VTD: KC 1012
52 VTD: KC 102
53 VTD: KC 103
54 VTD: KC 104
55 VTD: KC 105
56 VTD: KC 106
57 VTD: KC 107
58 VTD: KC 1101
59 Block: 290950003001011
60 Block: 290950003001012
61 Block: 290950003001013
62 Block: 290950003001014
63 Block: 290950003001017
64 Block: 290950003001018
65 Block: 290950003001019
66 Block: 290950003001020
67 Block: 290950003001022
68 Block: 290950003001024
69 Block: 290950003001025
70 Block: 290950003001026
71 Block: 290950003003016
72 Block: 290950003003020
73 Block: 290950003003021
74 Block: 290950003003022
75 Block: 290950003003024
76 Block: 290950003003025
77 VTD KC 1101 Subtotal
78 VTD: KC 1108
79 Block: 290950018002001
80 Block: 290950018002002
81 Block: 290950018002003
82 Block: 290950018002004
83 Block: 290950018002005
84 Block: 290950018002006
85 Block: 290950018002007
86 Block: 290950018002008

HB 1 68
87 Block: 290950018002009
88 Block: 290950018002010
89 Block: 290950018002011
90 VTD KC 1108 Subtotal
91 VTD: KC 1112
92 VTD: KC 1916
93 VTD: KC 1919
94 Block: 290950102031001
95 Block: 290950102031002
96 Block: 290950102031003
97 Block: 290950102031004
98 Block: 290950102031006
99 Block: 290950102031007
100 Block: 290950102031008
101 Block: 290950102031009
102 Block: 290950102031010
103 Block: 290950102031011
104 Block: 290950102031012
105 Block: 290950102031013
106 Block: 290950102031014
107 Block: 290950102031015
108 Block: 290950102031016
109 Block: 290950102031017
110 Block: 290950102031018
111 Block: 290950102031019
112 Block: 290950102031020
113 Block: 290950102031021
114 Block: 290950102031024
115 Block: 290950102034010
116 Block: 290950102034011
117 Block: 290950130032033
118 Block: 290950130032037
119 Block: 290950131003014
120 Block: 290950131003015
121 VTD KC 1919 Subtotal
122 VTD: KC 2001
123 Block: 290950131002011

HB 1 69
124 Block: 290950131002012
125 Block: 290950131002013
126 Block: 290950131002016
127 Block: 290950131002017
128 Block: 290950132082006
129 Block: 290950132082007
130 Block: 290950132082008
131 Block: 290950132082009
132 Block: 290950132082010
133 Block: 290950132082011
134 Block: 290950132082012
135 Block: 290950132082013
136 Block: 290950132082016
137 VTD KC 2001 Subtotal
138 VTD: KC 2002
139 VTD: KC 2003
140 VTD: KC 2004
141 Block: 290950102032000
142 Block: 290950102032001
143 Block: 290950102032002
144 Block: 290950102032003
145 Block: 290950102032004
146 Block: 290950102032005
147 Block: 290950102032006
148 Block: 290950102032007
149 Block: 290950102032008
150 Block: 290950102032009
151 Block: 290950102032010
152 Block: 290950102032011
153 Block: 290950102032012
154 Block: 290950102032013
155 Block: 290950102032014
156 Block: 290950102032015
157 Block: 290950102034000
158 VTD KC 2004 Subtotal
159 VTD: KC 2005
160 Block: 290950102032021

HB 1 70
161 Block: 290950102032022
162 Block: 290950102032023
163 Block: 290950102032024
164 Block: 290950102033001
165 Block: 290950102033002
166 Block: 290950102033003
167 Block: 290950102033004
168 Block: 290950102034001
169 Block: 290950102034002
170 Block: 290950102034004
171 Block: 290950102034006
172 Block: 290950102034007
173 Block: 290950102034008
174 Block: 290950102034009
175 VTD KC 2005 Subtotal
176 VTD: KC 2006
177 Block: 290950102033000
178 Block: 290950102034003
179 Block: 290950102034005
180 Block: 290950173001000
181 Block: 290950173001001
182 Block: 290950173001002
183 Block: 290950173001003
184 Block: 290950173001004
185 Block: 290950173001005
186 Block: 290950173001006
187 Block: 290950173001007
188 Block: 290950173001008
189 Block: 290950173001010
190 Block: 290950173001011
191 Block: 290950173001012
192 VTD KC 2006 Subtotal
193 VTD: KC 2007
194 VTD: KC 2008
195 VTD: KC 2009
196 VTD: KC 201
197 VTD: KC 2010

HB 1 71
198 VTD: KC 202
199 VTD: KC 203
200 Block: 290950154012001
201 Block: 290950154012002
202 Block: 290950154012003
203 Block: 290950154012004
204 Block: 290950154012013
205 Block: 290950154012014
206 Block: 290950154012015
207 Block: 290950154012016
208 Block: 290950154012017
209 Block: 290950154012020
210 Block: 290950154012021
211 Block: 290950154012022
212 Block: 290950154012023
213 Block: 290950154012024
214 VTD KC 203 Subtotal
215 VTD: KC 208
216 VTD: KC 212
217 Block: 290950043001000
218 Block: 290950043001001
219 Block: 290950043001007
220 Block: 290950043001009
221 Block: 290950043001010
222 Block: 290950043001019
223 Block: 290950043001020
224 Block: 290950043001021
225 Block: 290950154012037
226 Block: 290950154012058
227 Block: 290950158001000
228 Block: 290950158001027
229 Block: 290950158001029
230 Block: 290950158001030
231 Block: 290950158001064
232 Block: 290950158002026
233 Block: 290950159002028
234 Block: 290950159002029

HB 1 72
235 Block: 290950161001032
236 Block: 290950161002033
237 Block: 290950161002034
238 Block: 290950161002068
239 VTD KC 212 Subtotal
240 VTD: KC 217
241 Block: 290950154011015
242 Block: 290950154011016
243 Block: 290950154011026
244 Block: 290950154011027
245 Block: 290950154011028
246 Block: 290950154011029
247 Block: 290950154012006
248 Block: 290950154012007
249 Block: 290950154012008
250 Block: 290950154012009
251 Block: 290950154012010
252 Block: 290950154012011
253 Block: 290950154012026
254 Block: 290950154012027
255 Block: 290950154012028
256 Block: 290950154012029
257 Block: 290950154012036
258 Block: 290950154012038
259 VTD KC 217 Subtotal
260 VTD: KC 218
261 Block: 290950154011002
262 Block: 290950154011003
263 Block: 290950154011004
264 Block: 290950154011005
265 Block: 290950154011006
266 Block: 290950154011008
267 Block: 290950154011013
268 Block: 290950154011014
269 Block: 290950154011017
270 Block: 290950154011018
271 Block: 290950154011019

HB 1 73
272 Block: 290950154011020
273 Block: 290950154011024
274 Block: 290950154011025
275 Block: 290950154012005
276 Block: 290950154012012
277 Block: 290950154012025
278 VTD KC 218 Subtotal
279 VTD: KC 2201
280 VTD: KC 2202
281 VTD: KC 2203
282 VTD: KC 2204
283 VTD: KC 2205
284 VTD: KC 2206
285 VTD: KC 2207
286 VTD: KC 2208
287 VTD: KC 2209
288 VTD: KC 2210
289 VTD: KC 2211
290 VTD: KC 2212
291 VTD: KC 2213
292 VTD: KC 2502
293 VTD: KC 2503
294 Block: 290950136124000
295 Block: 290950136124002
296 Block: 290959883001007
297 Block: 290959883001011
298 Block: 290959883001012
299 Block: 290959883001013
300 Block: 290959883001014
301 Block: 290959883001015
302 Block: 290959883001016
303 Block: 290959883001017
304 VTD KC 2503 Subtotal
305 VTD: KC 2508
306 Block: 290950132082014
307 VTD KC 2508 Subtotal
308 VTD: KC 2510

HB 1 74
309 VTD: KC 2511
310 VTD: KC 2512
311 VTD: KC 401
312 VTD: KC 402
313 VTD: KC 403
314 VTD: KC 404
315 VTD: KC 405
316 VTD: KC 406
317 VTD: KC 407
318 VTD: KC 408
319 VTD: KC 409
320 VTD: KC 410
321 VTD: KC 411
322 VTD: KC 501
323 VTD: KC 502
324 VTD: KC 503
325 VTD: KC 504
326 VTD: KC 505
327 VTD: KC 506
328 VTD: KC 507
329 VTD: KC 508
330 VTD: KC 509
331 VTD: KC 510
332 VTD: KC 511
333 VTD: KC 512
334 VTD: KC 513
335 VTD: KC 601
336 VTD: KC 602
337 VTD: KC 603
338 VTD: KC 604
339 VTD: KC 605
340 VTD: KC 606
341 VTD: KC 607
342 VTD: KC 608
343 VTD: KC 609
344 VTD: KC 610
345 VTD: KC 611

HB 1 75
346 VTD: KC 612
347 VTD: KC 613
348 VTD: KC 614
349 VTD: KC 615
350 VTD: KC 801
351 VTD: KC 802
352 VTD: KC 803
353 VTD: KC 804
354 VTD: KC 805
355 VTD: KC 806
356 VTD: KC 807
357 VTD: KC 808
358 VTD: KC 809
359 Block: 290950086001004
360 Block: 290950086001005
361 Block: 290950086001006
362 Block: 290950086001007
363 Block: 290950086001008
364 Block: 290950086001009
365 Block: 290950086001011
366 Block: 290950086001013
367 Block: 290950086002006
368 Block: 290950086002007
369 Block: 290950086002008
370 Block: 290950086002009
371 Block: 290950086002010
372 Block: 290950086002011
373 Block: 290950086002012
374 Block: 290950086002013
375 Block: 290950086002014
376 Block: 290950086002015
377 Block: 290950086002016
378 Block: 290950086002017
379 Block: 290950086002018
380 Block: 290950086002019
381 Block: 290950086002020
382 Block: 290950086002021

HB 1 76
383 Block: 290950086002022
384 Block: 290950086002023
385 Block: 290950086002024
386 Block: 290950086002025
387 Block: 290950086002026
388 Block: 290950086002027
389 Block: 290950086002028
390 VTD KC 809 Subtotal
391 VTD: KC 811
392 VTD: KC 812
393 VTD: KC 813
394 VTD: KC 814
395 VTD: KC 815
396 VTD: KC 901
397 VTD: KC 902
398 VTD: KC 903
399 VTD: KC 904
400 VTD: KC 906
401 VTD: KC 907
402 VTD: KC 908
403 VTD: KC 909
404 VTD: KC 910
405 VTD: KC 911
406 VTD: KC WD2 PCT211
407 Block: 290950018003000
408 Block: 290950018003001
409 Block: 290950018003002
410 Block: 290950018003003
411 Block: 290950018003004
412 Block: 290950018003005
413 Block: 290950018003006
414 Block: 290950018003007
415 Block: 290950018003008
416 Block: 290950018003009
417 Block: 290950018003010
418 Block: 290950018003011
419 Block: 290950018003012

HB 1 77
420 Block: 290950018003013
421 Block: 290950018003014
422 Block: 290950018003015
423 Block: 290950018003016
424 Block: 290950018003017
425 Block: 290950018003018
426 Block: 290950018003019
427 Block: 290950018004004
428 VTD KC WD2 PCT211 Subtotal
429 VTD: KC WD8 PCT810
430 VTD: Prairie 03
431 VTD: Prairie 04
432 VTD: Prairie 05
433 VTD: Prairie 06
434 VTD: Prairie 07
435 VTD: Prairie 08
436 VTD: Prairie 09
437 VTD: Prairie 11
438 VTD: Prairie 12
439 VTD: Prairie 13
440 VTD: Prairie 14
441 VTD: Prairie 15
442 VTD: Prairie 16
443 VTD: Prairie 17
444 VTD: Prairie 18
445 VTD: Prairie 19
446 VTD: Prairie 20
447 VTD: Prairie 21
448 VTD: Prairie 22
449 VTD: Prairie 23
450 VTD: Prairie 24
451 VTD: Prairie 26
452 VTD: Prairie 27
453 Block: 290950142031000
454 Block: 290950142031001
455 Block: 290950142031002
456 Block: 290950142031003

HB 1 78
457 Block: 290950142031015
458 Block: 290950142031016
459 Block: 290950142031017
460 Block: 290950142031019
461 Block: 290950142031020
462 Block: 290950142031021
463 Block: 290950142032000
464 Block: 290950142032001
465 Block: 290950142032002
466 Block: 290950142032003
467 Block: 290950142032004
468 Block: 290950142032005
469 Block: 290950142032006
470 Block: 290950142033000
471 Block: 290950142033001
472 Block: 290950142033002
473 Block: 290950142033003
474 Block: 290950142033004
475 Block: 290950142033005
476 Block: 290950142033006
477 Block: 290950142033007
478 Block: 290950185003005
479 Block: 290950185003007
480 VTD Prairie 27 Subtotal
481 VTD: Prairie 28
482 VTD: Prairie 29
483 Block: 290950142061000
484 Block: 290950185002000
485 Block: 290950185002001
486 Block: 290950185002002
487 Block: 290950185002006
488 Block: 290950185003006
489 Block: 290950185003008
490 Block: 290950185003009
491 Block: 290950185003010
492 Block: 290950185003011
493 Block: 290950185003012

HB 1 79
494 Block: 290950185003013
495 Block: 290950185003014
496 Block: 290950185003015
497 Block: 290950185003016
498 Block: 290950185003017
499 Block: 290950185003018
500 Block: 290950193022015
501 Block: 290950193022016
502 Block: 290959891001001
503 Block: 290959891001002
504 Block: 290959891001003
505 Block: 290959891001011
506 VTD Prairie 29 Subtotal
507 VTD: Prairie 30
508 VTD: Prairie 31
509 VTD: Prairie 32
510 VTD: Prairie 33
511 VTD: Prairie 34
512 VTD: Prairie 35
513 VTD: Prairie 36
514 VTD: Prairie 37
515 VTD: Prairie 38
516 VTD: Prairie 39
517 VTD: Prairie 40
518 VTD: Prairie 41
519 VTD: Prairie 42
520 VTD: Prairie 43
521 VTD: Prairie 44
522 VTD: Prairie 45
523 VTD: Prairie 46
524 VTD: Prairie 47
525 VTD: Prairie 48
526 VTD: Prairie 49
527 VTD: Prairie 50
528 VTD: Prairie 51
529 VTD: Prairie 52
530 VTD: Prairie 56

HB 1 80
531 VTD: Prairie 59
532 VTD: Prairie 60
533 VTD: Prairie 62
534 VTD: Prarie 02
535 VTD: Prarie 10
536 VTD: Prarie 25
537 VTD: Prarie 53
538 VTD: Prarie 54
539 VTD: Prarie 55
540 VTD: Prarie 57
541 VTD: Prarie 58
542 VTD: Prarie 61
543 VTD: Prarie 63
544 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 02
545 Block: 290950193022001
546 Block: 290950193022003
547 Block: 290950193022004
548 Block: 290950193022005
549 VTD Sni-A-Bar 02 Subtotal
550 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 03
551 Block: 290950193022017
552 VTD Sni-A-Bar 03 Subtotal
553 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 07
554 Block: 290950148061000
555 Block: 290950148061001
556 Block: 290950149041002
557 Block: 290950149041003
558 Block: 290950149041005
559 Block: 290950149041006
560 Block: 290950149041007
561 Block: 290950149041008
562 Block: 290950149041009
563 Block: 290950149041013
564 Block: 290950149041014
565 Block: 290950149041015
566 Block: 290950149041017
567 Block: 290950149041018

HB 1 81
568 Block: 290950149041019
569 Block: 290950149041020
570 Block: 290950149041021
571 Block: 290950149041022
572 Block: 290950149041028
573 Block: 290950149041029
574 Block: 290950149041030
575 Block: 290950149041031
576 VTD Sni-A-Bar 07 Subtotal
577 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 08
578 Block: 290950148061015
579 Block: 290950148061016
580 Block: 290950148061017
581 Block: 290950148061018
582 Block: 290950148062000
583 Block: 290950148062001
584 Block: 290950148062002
585 Block: 290950148062003
586 Block: 290950148062004
587 Block: 290950148062005
588 Block: 290950148062006
589 Block: 290950148062007
590 Block: 290950148062008
591 Block: 290950148062009
592 Block: 290950148062010
593 Block: 290950148062011
594 Block: 290950148062012
595 Block: 290950148062013
596 Block: 290950148062014
597 Block: 290950148062015
598 Block: 290950148063000
599 Block: 290950148063001
600 Block: 290950148063002
601 Block: 290950148063003
602 Block: 290950148063004
603 Block: 290950148063005
604 Block: 290950148063006

HB 1 82
605 Block: 290950148063007
606 Block: 290950148063008
607 Block: 290950148063009
608 Block: 290950148063010
609 Block: 290959892001002
610 Block: 290959892001003
611 Block: 290959892001004
612 Block: 290959892001005
613 VTD Sni-A-Bar 08 Subtotal
614 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 09
615 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 10
616 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 11
617 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 12
618 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 13
619 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 14
620 Block: 290950149051001
621 Block: 290950149051016
622 Block: 290950149051017
623 Block: 290950149051018
624 Block: 290950149051019
625 Block: 290950149051020
626 Block: 290950149051021
627 Block: 290950149051022
628 Block: 290950149051025
629 Block: 290950149052003
630 Block: 290950149052016
631 Block: 290950149052017
632 Block: 290950149052018
633 Block: 290950149052019
634 Block: 290950149052020
635 Block: 290950149052021
636 Block: 290950149052022
637 Block: 290950149052025
638 Block: 290950149052029
639 Block: 290950149052030
640 Block: 290950149052031
641 Block: 290950149052032

HB 1 83
642 Block: 290950149052033
643 VTD Sni-A-Bar 14 Subtotal
644 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 15
645 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 16
646 Block: 290950141221006
647 Block: 290950141221007
648 Block: 290950141281001
649 Block: 290950141281002
650 Block: 290950141281003
651 Block: 290950141281004
652 Block: 290950141281005
653 Block: 290950141281008
654 Block: 290950141281009
655 Block: 290950141281010
656 Block: 290950141281017
657 Block: 290950141281018
658 Block: 290950141281019
659 Block: 290950141281020
660 Block: 290950141281024
661 Block: 290950141281025
662 Block: 290950141283000
663 VTD Sni-A-Bar 16 Subtotal
664 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 17
665 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 18
666 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 19
667 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 20
668 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 21
669 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 22
670 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 23
671 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 24
672 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 25
673 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 26
674 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 27
675 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 28
676 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 29
677 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 30
678 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 31

HB 1 84
679 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 32
680 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 33
681 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 34
682 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 35
683 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 36
684 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 37
685 Block: 290950140021009
686 Block: 290950140021011
687 Block: 290950140021014
688 Block: 290950140021015
689 Block: 290950140021026
690 Block: 290950140021027
691 Block: 290950140021028
692 Block: 290950140021029
693 Block: 290950140021030
694 Block: 290950140021031
695 Block: 290950140021032
696 Block: 290950140021035
697 Block: 290950140021036
698 Block: 290950140022006
699 Block: 290950140022007
700 Block: 290950140022008
701 Block: 290950140022009
702 Block: 290950140022010
703 Block: 290950140022011
704 Block: 290950140022012
705 Block: 290950140022013
706 Block: 290950140022016
707 Block: 290950140022017
708 Block: 290950140022018
709 Block: 290950140022040
710 Block: 290950140022041
711 Block: 290950140051019
712 Block: 290950140063021
713 Block: 290950140063022
714 Block: 290950140063023
715 Block: 290950140063024

HB 1 85
716 Block: 290950140063025
717 Block: 290950141112001
718 Block: 290950141112007
719 Block: 290950141112008
720 Block: 290950141121000
721 Block: 290950141121001
722 Block: 290950141121002
723 Block: 290950141121003
724 Block: 290950141121004
725 Block: 290950141121015
726 VTD Sni-A-Bar 37 Subtotal
727 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 41
728 Block: 290950141281000
729 VTD Sni-A-Bar 41 Subtotal
730 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 45
731 Block: 290950140021019
732 Block: 290950140021020
733 Block: 290950140021022
734 Block: 290950140021023
735 Block: 290950140021024
736 Block: 290950140021025
737 Block: 290950140021033
738 Block: 290950140021034
739 Block: 290950140022003
740 Block: 290950140022004
741 Block: 290950140022005
742 Block: 290950140022024
743 Block: 290950140051035
744 Block: 290950140051036
745 Block: 290950140051037
746 Block: 290950140051039
747 Block: 290950140051040
748 Block: 290950140051041
749 Block: 290950140051042
750 Block: 290950140054015
751 Block: 290950140054016
752 Block: 290950140054018

HB 1 86
753 VTD Sni-A-Bar 45 Subtotal
754 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 83
755 VTD: Van Buren 01
756 VTD: Van Buren 02
757 VTD: Van Buren 03
758 VTD: Van Buren 04
759 VTD: Van Buren 06
760 VTD: Van Buren 07
761 VTD: Van Buren 08
762 VTD: Van Buren 09
763 VTD: Van Buren 10
764 VTD: Van Buren 11
765 VTD: Van Buren 12
766 VTD: Van Buren 13
767 VTD: Van Buren 14
768 VTD: Van Buren 15
769 VTD: Van Buren 16
770 VTD: Van Buren 17
771 VTD: Van Buren 18
772 VTD: Van Buren 19
773 VTD: Washington 01
774 VTD: Washington 02
775 VTD: Washington 03
776 VTD: Washington 04
777 VTD: Washington 05
778 VTD: Washington 06
779 VTD: Washington 07
780 VTD: Washington 08
781 VTD: Washington 09
782 VTD: Washington 10
783 VTD: Washington 11
784 VTD: Washington 12
785 County Jackson MO Subtotal
786 County: Laclede MO
787 County: Polk MO
788 County: Pulaski MO
789 County: St. Clair MO

HB 1 87
790 County: Vernon MO
791 County: Webster MO
792 VTD: East Ozark
793 VTD: Grant
794 Block: 292254701021041
795 Block: 292254701021042
796 Block: 292254701022000
797 Block: 292254701022001
798 Block: 292254701022002
799 Block: 292254701022003
800 Block: 292254701022004
801 Block: 292254701022005
802 Block: 292254701022006
803 Block: 292254701022007
804 Block: 292254701022008
805 Block: 292254701022009
806 Block: 292254701022010
807 Block: 292254701022011
808 Block: 292254701022012
809 Block: 292254701022013
810 Block: 292254701022014
811 Block: 292254701022015
812 Block: 292254701022019
813 Block: 292254701022020
814 Block: 292254701022021
815 Block: 292254701022022
816 Block: 292254701022023
817 Block: 292254701022024
818 Block: 292254701022025
819 Block: 292254701022026
820 Block: 292254701022027
821 Block: 292254701022028
822 Block: 292254701022029
823 Block: 292254701022030
824 Block: 292254701022031
825 Block: 292254701022032
826 Block: 292254701022033

HB 1 88
827 Block: 292254701022034
828 Block: 292254701022035
829 Block: 292254701022036
830 Block: 292254701022037
831 Block: 292254701022038
832 Block: 292254701022039
833 Block: 292254701022040
834 Block: 292254701022041
835 Block: 292254701022042
836 Block: 292254701022043
837 Block: 292254701022044
838 Block: 292254701022045
839 Block: 292254701022046
840 Block: 292254701022047
841 Block: 292254701022048
842 Block: 292254701022049
843 Block: 292254701022050
844 Block: 292254701022051
845 Block: 292254701022052
846 Block: 292254701022053
847 Block: 292254701022054
848 Block: 292254701022055
849 Block: 292254701022056
850 Block: 292254701022057
851 Block: 292254701022058
852 Block: 292254701022059
853 Block: 292254701022061
854 Block: 292254701023081
855 Block: 292254701023082
856 Block: 292254701023085
857 Block: 292254701023086
858 VTD Grant Subtotal
859 VTD: High Prairie
860 VTD: Jackson
861 VTD: Marshfield East
862 VTD: Marshfield West
863 VTD: Niangua

HB 1 89
864 VTD: Northview A
865 VTD: Northview B
866 Block: 292254702022011
867 Block: 292254702022012
868 Block: 292254702022013
869 Block: 292254702022016
870 Block: 292254702022019
871 Block: 292254702022020
872 Block: 292254702022021
873 Block: 292254702022022
874 Block: 292254702022023
875 Block: 292254702022024
876 Block: 292254702022025
877 Block: 292254702022037
878 Block: 292254702022038
879 Block: 292254702022039
880 Block: 292254702022040
881 Block: 292254703022009
882 Block: 292254703022011
883 Block: 292254703023000
884 Block: 292254703023001
885 Block: 292254703023002
886 Block: 292254703023003
887 Block: 292254703023004
888 Block: 292254703023005
889 Block: 292254703023006
890 Block: 292254703023014
891 Block: 292254703023015
892 Block: 292254703023016
893 Block: 292254703023017
894 Block: 292254703023018
895 Block: 292254703023019
896 Block: 292254703023020
897 Block: 292254703023021
898 Block: 292254703023022
899 Block: 292254703023023
900 Block: 292254703023024

HB 1 90
901 Block: 292254703023025
902 Block: 292254703023026
903 Block: 292254703023027
904 Block: 292254703023034
905 VTD Northview B Subtotal
906 VTD: Union
907 VTD: Washington
908 County Webster MO Subtotal
909 District 4 Total
128.475. The fifth congressional district shall be composed of the following:
2 County: Boone MO
3 VTD: 07
4 VTD: 08
5 VTD: 09
6 VTD: 10
7 VTD: 11
8 VTD: 12
9 VTD: 15
10 VTD: 16
11 VTD: 17
12 Block: 290190015031004
13 Block: 290190015031013
14 Block: 290190015062000
15 Block: 290190015062001
16 Block: 290190015062002
17 Block: 290190015062003
18 Block: 290190015062004
19 Block: 290190015062006
20 Block: 290190015062007
21 Block: 290190015062012
22 Block: 290190015062018
23 Block: 290190015062019
24 Block: 290190015062021
25 Block: 290190016031001
26 Block: 290190016031005
27 Block: 290190016031006
28 Block: 290190016031007

HB 1 91
29 Block: 290190016031012
30 Block: 290190016031017
31 Block: 290190019031003
32 Block: 290190019031004
33 Block: 290190019031005
34 Block: 290190019031006
35 Block: 290190019031007
36 Block: 290190019031008
37 Block: 290190019031009
38 Block: 290190019031010
39 Block: 290190019031011
40 Block: 290190019031012
41 Block: 290190019031013
42 Block: 290190019031014
43 Block: 290190019031015
44 Block: 290190019031016
45 Block: 290190019031017
46 Block: 290190019031018
47 Block: 290190019031019
48 Block: 290190019031020
49 Block: 290190019031021
50 Block: 290190019031022
51 Block: 290190019031023
52 Block: 290190019031024
53 Block: 290190019032037
54 Block: 290190019032038
55 Block: 290190019032044
56 Block: 290190019032045
57 Block: 290190019032046
58 Block: 290190019032047
59 Block: 290190019032049
60 Block: 290190019033053
61 Block: 290190019033054
62 Block: 290190019033055
63 Block: 290190019033056
64 Block: 290190019033057
65 Block: 290190019033059

HB 1 92
66 Block: 290190019033060
67 VTD 17 Subtotal
68 VTD: 18
69 VTD: 19
70 VTD: 20
71 Block: 290190014013030
72 Block: 290190014013031
73 Block: 290190014013032
74 Block: 290190014013048
75 Block: 290190014013051
76 Block: 290190014024000
77 Block: 290190014024004
78 Block: 290190014024005
79 Block: 290190014024006
80 Block: 290190014024007
81 Block: 290190014024008
82 Block: 290190014024011
83 Block: 290190014024012
84 Block: 290190018031003
85 Block: 290190018031004
86 Block: 290190018031005
87 Block: 290190018031006
88 Block: 290190018031007
89 Block: 290190018031008
90 Block: 290190018031010
91 Block: 290190018031011
92 Block: 290190018031019
93 Block: 290190018031020
94 Block: 290190018031021
95 Block: 290190018031022
96 Block: 290190018031023
97 Block: 290190018031024
98 Block: 290190018031025
99 Block: 290190018031026
100 Block: 290190018031027
101 Block: 290190018031028
102 Block: 290190018032000

HB 1 93
103 Block: 290190018032001
104 Block: 290190018032007
105 Block: 290190019012028
106 Block: 290190019012029
107 Block: 290190019012030
108 Block: 290190019012031
109 Block: 290190019012032
110 Block: 290190019012037
111 Block: 290190019012038
112 Block: 290190019012046
113 Block: 290190019012047
114 Block: 290190019012049
115 Block: 290190019012051
116 Block: 290190019013050
117 VTD 20 Subtotal
118 VTD: 21
119 Block: 290190013003003
120 Block: 290190013003004
121 Block: 290190018061007
122 Block: 290190018071011
123 Block: 290190018071012
124 Block: 290190018071013
125 Block: 290190018071014
126 Block: 290190018071015
127 Block: 290190018071016
128 Block: 290190018071022
129 Block: 290190018071023
130 Block: 290190018071024
131 Block: 290190018071025
132 Block: 290190018071026
133 Block: 290190018071027
134 Block: 290190018071028
135 Block: 290190018072000
136 Block: 290190018072012
137 Block: 290190018072014
138 Block: 290190018072017
139 Block: 290190018072018

HB 1 94
140 Block: 290190018072022
141 Block: 290190018072023
142 VTD 21 Subtotal
143 VTD: 22
144 Block: 290190014012004
145 Block: 290190014012005
146 Block: 290190014012006
147 Block: 290190014012007
148 Block: 290190014012008
149 Block: 290190014012009
150 Block: 290190014012010
151 Block: 290190014012011
152 Block: 290190014012012
153 Block: 290190014012013
154 Block: 290190014012015
155 Block: 290190014012016
156 Block: 290190014012019
157 Block: 290190014012020
158 Block: 290190014012021
159 Block: 290190014012027
160 Block: 290190014012028
161 Block: 290190014012031
162 Block: 290190014013000
163 Block: 290190014013001
164 Block: 290190014013002
165 Block: 290190014013003
166 Block: 290190014013004
167 Block: 290190014013005
168 Block: 290190014013006
169 Block: 290190014013012
170 Block: 290190014013017
171 Block: 290190014013025
172 Block: 290190014013026
173 Block: 290190014013027
174 Block: 290190014013028
175 Block: 290190014013029
176 Block: 290190014013033

HB 1 95
177 Block: 290190014013055
178 Block: 290190018031012
179 Block: 290190018031013
180 Block: 290190018031014
181 Block: 290190018031029
182 Block: 290190018031030
183 VTD 22 Subtotal
184 VTD: 2I
185 Block: 290190014013053
186 VTD 2I Subtotal
187 VTD: 2K
188 Block: 290190018072001
189 Block: 290190018072002
190 Block: 290190018072003
191 Block: 290190018072004
192 Block: 290190018072005
193 Block: 290190018072006
194 Block: 290190018072007
195 Block: 290190018072008
196 Block: 290190018072010
197 VTD 2K Subtotal
198 VTD: 37
199 Block: 290190017021039
200 Block: 290190017021040
201 Block: 290190018062032
202 Block: 290190018062034
203 Block: 290190018062039
204 Block: 290190018062040
205 Block: 290190018062041
206 Block: 290190018062042
207 Block: 290190018062043
208 Block: 290190018062045
209 VTD 37 Subtotal
210 VTD: 38
211 VTD: 39
212 VTD: 3A
213 Block: 290190015062030

HB 1 96
214 VTD 3A Subtotal
215 VTD: 3B
216 Block: 290190015062017
217 VTD 3B Subtotal
218 VTD: 40
219 Block: 290190015031005
220 Block: 290190015031006
221 Block: 290190015031007
222 Block: 290190015031008
223 Block: 290190015031009
224 Block: 290190015031021
225 Block: 290190015031022
226 Block: 290190015031026
227 Block: 290190015033000
228 Block: 290190015033001
229 Block: 290190015033002
230 Block: 290190015033003
231 Block: 290190015033004
232 Block: 290190015033005
233 Block: 290190015033009
234 Block: 290190015033010
235 Block: 290190015033011
236 Block: 290190015033013
237 Block: 290190015033015
238 Block: 290190015033017
239 Block: 290190015033018
240 Block: 290190015033019
241 Block: 290190015033020
242 Block: 290190015033021
243 Block: 290190015033023
244 Block: 290190015033024
245 Block: 290190015033031
246 Block: 290190015033053
247 Block: 290190015033054
248 Block: 290190015033055
249 Block: 290190019032050
250 Block: 290190019032051

HB 1 97
251 Block: 290190019032054
252 VTD 40 Subtotal
253 VTD: 45
254 Block: 290190015031023
255 Block: 290190015031024
256 Block: 290190015031025
257 Block: 290190015031027
258 Block: 290190015031028
259 Block: 290190015031029
260 Block: 290190015031030
261 Block: 290190015031031
262 Block: 290190015032015
263 Block: 290190015033027
264 Block: 290190015033029
265 Block: 290190015033032
266 Block: 290190015033049
267 Block: 290190015033050
268 Block: 290190015033051
269 Block: 290190015033056
270 Block: 290190015033057
271 Block: 290190015033058
272 Block: 290190015081000
273 Block: 290190015081001
274 VTD 45 Subtotal
275 VTD: 4B
276 Block: 290190018071000
277 Block: 290190018071001
278 Block: 290190018071002
279 Block: 290190018071003
280 Block: 290190018071004
281 Block: 290190018071005
282 Block: 290190018071006
283 Block: 290190018071007
284 Block: 290190018071008
285 Block: 290190018071009
286 Block: 290190018071010
287 Block: 290190018072009

HB 1 98
288 Block: 290190018072011
289 Block: 290190018072013
290 Block: 290190018072016
291 Block: 290190018072019
292 Block: 290190018072020
293 Block: 290190018072021
294 Block: 290190018072026
295 VTD 4B Subtotal
296 VTD: 4K
297 Block: 290190018072027
298 VTD 4K Subtotal
299 VTD: 4L
300 Block: 290190018072015
301 VTD 4L Subtotal
302 County Boone MO Subtotal
303 County: Cole MO
304 County: Cooper MO
305 County: Howard MO
306 County: Jackson MO
307 VTD: 1603
308 VTD: Blue 01-01
309 VTD: Blue 01-02
310 VTD: Blue 01-03
311 VTD: Blue 01-04
312 VTD: Blue 01-05
313 VTD: Blue 01-06
314 VTD: Blue 01-07
315 VTD: Blue 01-08
316 VTD: Blue 01-09
317 VTD: Blue 02-01
318 VTD: Blue 02-02
319 VTD: Blue 02-03
320 VTD: Blue 02-04
321 VTD: Blue 02-05
322 VTD: Blue 02-06
323 VTD: Blue 02-07
324 VTD: Blue 03-01

HB 1 99
325 VTD: Blue 03-02
326 VTD: Blue 03-03
327 VTD: Blue 03-04
328 VTD: Blue 03-05
329 VTD: Blue 03-06
330 VTD: Blue 03-07
331 VTD: Blue 03-08
332 VTD: Blue 03-09
333 VTD: Blue 04-01
334 VTD: Blue 04-02
335 VTD: Blue 04-03
336 VTD: Blue 04-04
337 VTD: Blue 04-05
338 VTD: Blue 04-06
339 VTD: Blue 04-07
340 VTD: Blue 04-08
341 VTD: Blue 04-09
342 VTD: Blue 04-10
343 VTD: Blue 05-01
344 VTD: Blue 05-02
345 VTD: Blue 05-03
346 VTD: Blue 05-04
347 VTD: Blue 05-05
348 VTD: Blue 05-06
349 VTD: Blue 05-07
350 VTD: Blue 05-08
351 VTD: Blue 05-09
352 VTD: Blue 06-01
353 VTD: Blue 06-02
354 VTD: Blue 06-03
355 VTD: Blue 06-04
356 VTD: Blue 06-05
357 VTD: Blue 06-06
358 VTD: Blue 06-07
359 VTD: Blue 07-01
360 VTD: Blue 07-02
361 VTD: Blue 07-03

HB 1 100
362 VTD: Blue 07-04
363 VTD: Blue 07-05
364 VTD: Blue 07-06
365 VTD: Blue 07-07
366 VTD: Blue 07-08
367 VTD: Blue 07-09
368 VTD: Blue 08-01
369 VTD: Blue 08-02
370 VTD: Blue 08-03
371 VTD: Blue 08-04
372 VTD: Blue 08-05
373 VTD: Blue 08-06
374 VTD: Blue 08-07
375 VTD: Blue 08-08
376 VTD: Brooking No. 1
377 VTD: Brooking No. 10
378 VTD: Brooking No. 11
379 VTD: Brooking No. 12
380 VTD: Brooking No. 13
381 VTD: Brooking No. 14
382 VTD: Brooking No. 15
383 VTD: Brooking No. 16
384 VTD: Brooking No. 17
385 VTD: Brooking No. 18
386 VTD: Brooking No. 19
387 VTD: Brooking No. 2
388 VTD: Brooking No. 20
389 VTD: Brooking No. 3
390 VTD: Brooking No. 4
391 VTD: Brooking No. 5
392 VTD: Brooking No. 6
393 VTD: Brooking No. 7
394 VTD: Brooking No. 8
395 VTD: Brooking No. 9
396 VTD: Fort Osage 01
397 VTD: Fort Osage 02
398 VTD: Fort Osage 03

HB 1 101
399 VTD: Fort Osage 04
400 VTD: Fort Osage 05
401 VTD: Fort Osage 06
402 VTD: Fort Osage 07
403 VTD: Fort Osage 08
404 VTD: Fort Osage 09
405 VTD: Fort Osage 10
406 VTD: KC 1004
407 Block: 290950100021000
408 Block: 290950100021001
409 Block: 290950100021009
410 Block: 290950100021010
411 Block: 290950100021011
412 VTD KC 1004 Subtotal
413 VTD: KC 1008
414 Block: 290950100022005
415 Block: 290950100022006
416 Block: 290950100022007
417 Block: 290950100022009
418 Block: 290950100022010
419 VTD KC 1008 Subtotal
420 VTD: KC 1009
421 Block: 290950100022000
422 Block: 290950100022001
423 VTD KC 1009 Subtotal
424 VTD: KC 1108
425 Block: 290950018002000
426 VTD KC 1108 Subtotal
427 VTD: KC 1201
428 Block: 290950007003001
429 Block: 290950007003002
430 Block: 290950007003003
431 Block: 290950007003004
432 Block: 290950007003007
433 Block: 290950007003008
434 Block: 290950008002000
435 Block: 290950008002001

HB 1 102
436 VTD KC 1201 Subtotal
437 VTD: KC 1205
438 VTD: KC 1206
439 VTD: KC 1207
440 VTD: KC 1208
441 VTD: KC 1209
442 VTD: KC 1210
443 VTD: KC 1211
444 VTD: KC 1212
445 VTD: KC 1301
446 VTD: KC 1303
447 VTD: KC 1304
448 VTD: KC 1305
449 VTD: KC 1306
450 VTD: KC 1307
451 VTD: KC 1308
452 VTD: KC 1309
453 VTD: KC 1310
454 VTD: KC 1311
455 VTD: KC 1313
456 VTD: KC 1401
457 VTD: KC 1402
458 VTD: KC 1403
459 VTD: KC 1404
460 VTD: KC 1405
461 VTD: KC 1406
462 VTD: KC 1407
463 VTD: KC 1408
464 VTD: KC 1409
465 VTD: KC 1410
466 VTD: KC 1411
467 VTD: KC 1412
468 VTD: KC 1413
469 VTD: KC 1414
470 VTD: KC 1415
471 VTD: KC 1501
472 VTD: KC 1502

HB 1 103
473 VTD: KC 1503
474 VTD: KC 1504
475 VTD: KC 1505
476 VTD: KC 1506
477 VTD: KC 1507
478 VTD: KC 1508
479 VTD: KC 1509
480 VTD: KC 1510
481 VTD: KC 1511
482 VTD: KC 1512
483 VTD: KC 1513
484 VTD: KC 1514
485 VTD: KC 1515
486 VTD: KC 1516
487 VTD: KC 1517
488 VTD: KC 1518
489 VTD: KC 1519
490 VTD: KC 1520
491 VTD: KC 1521
492 VTD: KC 1522
493 VTD: KC 1523
494 VTD: KC 1524
495 VTD: KC 1601
496 VTD: KC 1602
497 VTD: KC 1604
498 VTD: KC 1605
499 VTD: KC 1606
500 VTD: KC 1607
501 VTD: KC 1608
502 VTD: KC 1609
503 VTD: KC 1610
504 VTD: KC 1611
505 VTD: KC 1612
506 VTD: KC 1613
507 VTD: KC 1614
508 VTD: KC 1615
509 VTD: KC 1701

HB 1 104
510 VTD: KC 1702
511 VTD: KC 1703
512 VTD: KC 1704
513 VTD: KC 1705
514 VTD: KC 1706
515 VTD: KC 1707
516 VTD: KC 1708
517 VTD: KC 1709
518 VTD: KC 1710
519 VTD: KC 1711
520 VTD: KC 1712
521 VTD: KC 1713
522 VTD: KC 1714
523 VTD: KC 1801
524 VTD: KC 1802
525 VTD: KC 1803
526 VTD: KC 1804
527 VTD: KC 1805
528 VTD: KC 1806
529 VTD: KC 1807
530 VTD: KC 1808
531 VTD: KC 1809
532 VTD: KC 1810
533 VTD: KC 1811
534 VTD: KC 1812
535 VTD: KC 1813
536 VTD: KC 1814
537 VTD: KC 1815
538 VTD: KC 1816
539 VTD: KC 1901
540 VTD: KC 1902
541 VTD: KC 1903
542 VTD: KC 1904
543 VTD: KC 1905
544 VTD: KC 1906
545 VTD: KC 1907
546 VTD: KC 1908

HB 1 105
547 VTD: KC 1909
548 VTD: KC 1910
549 VTD: KC 1911
550 VTD: KC 1912
551 VTD: KC 1913
552 VTD: KC 1914
553 VTD: KC 1915
554 VTD: KC 1917
555 VTD: KC 1918
556 VTD: KC 1919
557 Block: 290950102011013
558 Block: 290950130032034
559 VTD KC 1919 Subtotal
560 VTD: KC 1920
561 VTD: KC 1921
562 VTD: KC 1922
563 VTD: KC 1923
564 VTD: KC 2001
565 Block: 290950132082004
566 Block: 290950132082005
567 VTD KC 2001 Subtotal
568 VTD: KC 2004
569 Block: 290950102011012
570 VTD KC 2004 Subtotal
571 VTD: KC 2005
572 Block: 290950102011011
573 VTD KC 2005 Subtotal
574 VTD: KC 2006
575 Block: 290950101031016
576 Block: 290950101032004
577 Block: 290950101032005
578 Block: 290950101033007
579 VTD KC 2006 Subtotal
580 VTD: KC 203
581 Block: 290950154012030
582 Block: 290950154012031
583 Block: 290950154012032

HB 1 106
584 Block: 290950154012033
585 Block: 290950154012034
586 Block: 290950154012039
587 Block: 290950154012040
588 Block: 290950154012041
589 Block: 290950154012042
590 Block: 290950154012046
591 Block: 290950154012047
592 Block: 290950154012054
593 Block: 290950154012055
594 Block: 290950154012056
595 Block: 290950154012057
596 Block: 290950154013011
597 Block: 290950154013012
598 Block: 290950154013013
599 Block: 290950154013014
600 Block: 290950154013015
601 Block: 290950161002000
602 Block: 290950161002001
603 Block: 290950161002002
604 Block: 290950161002003
605 Block: 290950161002004
606 Block: 290950161002005
607 Block: 290950161002006
608 Block: 290950161002007
609 Block: 290950161002008
610 Block: 290950161002009
611 Block: 290950161002010
612 Block: 290950161002011
613 Block: 290950161002012
614 Block: 290950161002013
615 Block: 290950161002014
616 Block: 290950161002015
617 Block: 290950161002016
618 Block: 290950161002017
619 VTD KC 203 Subtotal
620 VTD: KC 204

HB 1 107
621 VTD: KC 207
622 VTD: KC 209
623 VTD: KC 210
624 VTD: KC 212
625 Block: 290950154012059
626 Block: 290950161001012
627 Block: 290950161001013
628 Block: 290950161001014
629 Block: 290950161001015
630 Block: 290950161001028
631 Block: 290950161001029
632 Block: 290950161002032
633 Block: 290950161002035
634 Block: 290950161002038
635 Block: 290950161002039
636 VTD KC 212 Subtotal
637 VTD: KC 213
638 VTD: KC 214
639 VTD: KC 215
640 VTD: KC 217
641 Block: 290950154012035
642 Block: 290950154012044
643 Block: 290950154012045
644 Block: 290950154012049
645 Block: 290950154012050
646 VTD KC 217 Subtotal
647 VTD: KC 218
648 Block: 290950154012043
649 Block: 290950154012048
650 Block: 290950154012051
651 Block: 290950154012052
652 Block: 290950154012053
653 Block: 290950161002031
654 Block: 290950161002036
655 Block: 290950161002037
656 Block: 290950161002041
657 VTD KC 218 Subtotal

HB 1 108
658 VTD: KC 2301
659 VTD: KC 2302
660 VTD: KC 2303
661 VTD: KC 2304
662 VTD: KC 2305
663 VTD: KC 2306
664 VTD: KC 2307
665 VTD: KC 2308
666 VTD: KC 2309
667 VTD: KC 2310
668 VTD: KC 2311
669 VTD: KC 2312
670 VTD: KC 2313
671 VTD: KC 2314
672 VTD: KC 2315
673 VTD: KC 2316
674 VTD: KC 2401
675 VTD: KC 2402
676 VTD: KC 2403
677 VTD: KC 2404
678 VTD: KC 2405
679 VTD: KC 2406
680 VTD: KC 2407
681 VTD: KC 2408
682 VTD: KC 2409
683 VTD: KC 2410
684 VTD: KC 2411
685 VTD: KC 2412
686 VTD: KC 2413
687 VTD: KC 2414
688 VTD: KC 2415
689 VTD: KC 2416
690 VTD: KC 2417
691 VTD: KC 2418
692 VTD: KC 2419
693 VTD: KC 2420
694 VTD: KC 2421

HB 1 109
695 VTD: KC 2422
696 VTD: KC 2423
697 VTD: KC 2424
698 VTD: KC 2425
699 VTD: KC 2426
700 VTD: KC 2427
701 VTD: KC 2428
702 VTD: KC 2429
703 VTD: KC 2430
704 VTD: KC 2431
705 VTD: KC 2501
706 VTD: KC 2503
707 Block: 290950129064013
708 Block: 290950129064014
709 Block: 290950132081009
710 Block: 290950132101000
711 Block: 290950132101001
712 Block: 290950132101004
713 Block: 290950132101005
714 Block: 290950132101008
715 Block: 290950132101009
716 Block: 290950132101010
717 Block: 290950144001046
718 Block: 290950144001047
719 Block: 290950144001048
720 Block: 290950144001049
721 Block: 290950144001050
722 Block: 290950144001051
723 Block: 290950144001054
724 Block: 290959883001000
725 Block: 290959883001001
726 Block: 290959883001002
727 Block: 290959883001003
728 Block: 290959883001005
729 Block: 290959883001006
730 Block: 290959883001008
731 Block: 290959883001009

HB 1 110
732 Block: 290959883001010
733 Block: 290959883001033
734 VTD KC 2503 Subtotal
735 VTD: KC 2504
736 VTD: KC 2505
737 VTD: KC 2506
738 VTD: KC 2507
739 VTD: KC 2508
740 Block: 290950131001010
741 Block: 290950132033004
742 Block: 290950132033005
743 Block: 290950132034003
744 Block: 290950132034004
745 Block: 290950132034005
746 Block: 290950132034006
747 Block: 290950132034007
748 Block: 290950132034008
749 Block: 290950132034009
750 Block: 290950132034010
751 Block: 290950132034011
752 Block: 290950132034012
753 Block: 290950132034013
754 Block: 290950132034014
755 Block: 290950132082000
756 Block: 290950132082001
757 Block: 290950132082002
758 Block: 290950132082003
759 Block: 290950132082015
760 Block: 290950132082017
761 VTD KC 2508 Subtotal
762 VTD: KC 2509
763 VTD: KC 2513
764 VTD: KC 2514
765 VTD: KC 2601
766 VTD: KC 2602
767 VTD: KC 2603
768 VTD: KC 2604

HB 1 111
769 VTD: KC 2605
770 VTD: KC 2606
771 VTD: KC 2607
772 VTD: KC 2608
773 VTD: KC 2609
774 VTD: KC 2610
775 VTD: KC 2611
776 VTD: KC 2612
777 VTD: KC 2613
778 VTD: KC 301
779 VTD: KC 302
780 VTD: KC 303
781 VTD: KC 304
782 VTD: KC 305
783 VTD: KC 306
784 VTD: KC 307
785 VTD: KC 308
786 VTD: KC 309
787 VTD: KC 310
788 VTD: KC 311
789 VTD: KC 312
790 VTD: KC 313
791 VTD: KC 314
792 VTD: KC 315
793 VTD: KC 316
794 VTD: KC 317
795 VTD: KC 318
796 VTD: KC 701
797 VTD: KC 702
798 VTD: KC 703
799 VTD: KC 704
800 VTD: KC 705
801 VTD: KC 706
802 VTD: KC 707
803 VTD: KC 708
804 VTD: KC 709
805 VTD: KC 710

HB 1 112
806 VTD: KC 711
807 VTD: KC 712
808 VTD: KC 713
809 VTD: KC 714
810 VTD: KC 715
811 VTD: KC 716
812 VTD: KC 717
813 VTD: KC 718
814 VTD: KC 809
815 Block: 290950086001010
816 Block: 290950086001012
817 VTD KC 809 Subtotal
818 VTD: KC 811
819 VTD: KC 905
820 VTD: KC 913
821 VTD: KC WD13 PCT1302
822 VTD: KC WD2 PCT205
823 VTD: KC WD2 PCT206
824 VTD: KC WD2 PCT211
825 Block: 290950018004000
826 Block: 290950018004001
827 Block: 290950018004002
828 Block: 290950018004003
829 Block: 290950018004005
830 Block: 290950018004006
831 Block: 290950018004007
832 Block: 290950018004008
833 Block: 290950018004009
834 Block: 290950018004010
835 Block: 290950018004011
836 Block: 290950018004012
837 Block: 290950018004013
838 Block: 290950018004014
839 Block: 290950018004015
840 Block: 290950160001000
841 Block: 290950160001001
842 Block: 290950160001002

HB 1 113
843 Block: 290950160001003
844 Block: 290950160001004
845 Block: 290950160001005
846 Block: 290950160001006
847 Block: 290950160001007
848 Block: 290950160001008
849 Block: 290950160001009
850 Block: 290950160001010
851 Block: 290950160001011
852 Block: 290950160001012
853 Block: 290950160001013
854 Block: 290950160001014
855 Block: 290950160001015
856 Block: 290950160001016
857 Block: 290950160001017
858 Block: 290950160001018
859 Block: 290950160001019
860 Block: 290950160001020
861 Block: 290950160001021
862 Block: 290950160001022
863 Block: 290950160001023
864 Block: 290950160001024
865 Block: 290950160001025
866 Block: 290950160001028
867 Block: 290950160001029
868 Block: 290950160001030
869 Block: 290950160001032
870 Block: 290950160001033
871 Block: 290950160001034
872 Block: 290950160001035
873 Block: 290950160001036
874 Block: 290950160001037
875 Block: 290950160001038
876 Block: 290950160001039
877 Block: 290950160001051
878 Block: 290950160001052
879 VTD KC WD2 PCT211 Subtotal

HB 1 114
880 VTD: KC1314
881 VTD: Prairie 27
882 Block: 290950185003004
883 VTD Prairie 27 Subtotal
884 VTD: Prairie 29
885 Block: 290950185003000
886 Block: 290950185003001
887 Block: 290950185003002
888 Block: 290950185003003
889 Block: 290950193022014
890 VTD Prairie 29 Subtotal
891 VTD: Prarie 01
892 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 01
893 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 02
894 Block: 290950145031003
895 Block: 290950145031004
896 Block: 290950145031013
897 Block: 290950145031014
898 Block: 290950193012014
899 Block: 290950193022000
900 Block: 290950193022009
901 Block: 290950193022010
902 Block: 290950193022011
903 Block: 290950193022019
904 VTD Sni-A-Bar 02 Subtotal
905 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 03
906 Block: 290950193022006
907 Block: 290950193022007
908 Block: 290950193022008
909 VTD Sni-A-Bar 03 Subtotal
910 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 04
911 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 05
912 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 06
913 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 07
914 Block: 290950148041042
915 Block: 290950148041043
916 Block: 290950148041044

HB 1 115
917 Block: 290950149033024
918 Block: 290950149033025
919 Block: 290950149033026
920 Block: 290950149033027
921 Block: 290950149033028
922 Block: 290950149041000
923 Block: 290950149041001
924 Block: 290950149041004
925 Block: 290950149041010
926 Block: 290950149041011
927 Block: 290950149041012
928 Block: 290950149052005
929 Block: 290950149052006
930 Block: 290950149054000
931 Block: 290950149054001
932 Block: 290950149054011
933 VTD Sni-A-Bar 07 Subtotal
934 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 08
935 Block: 290950148042027
936 Block: 290950148042028
937 Block: 290959892001006
938 VTD Sni-A-Bar 08 Subtotal
939 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 14
940 Block: 290950140091012
941 Block: 290950149051000
942 Block: 290950149052014
943 Block: 290950149052015
944 Block: 290950149052026
945 VTD Sni-A-Bar 14 Subtotal
946 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 16
947 Block: 290950140083002
948 Block: 290950141221004
949 Block: 290950141221005
950 Block: 290950141221010
951 Block: 290950141221021
952 Block: 290950141281026
953 Block: 290950141281027

HB 1 116
954 Block: 290950141281029
955 VTD Sni-A-Bar 16 Subtotal
956 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 37
957 Block: 290950140021004
958 Block: 290950140021005
959 Block: 290950140021008
960 Block: 290950140021010
961 Block: 290950140021012
962 Block: 290950140021013
963 Block: 290950140021016
964 Block: 290950140063005
965 Block: 290950140063007
966 Block: 290950140063013
967 Block: 290950140063019
968 Block: 290950140063020
969 VTD Sni-A-Bar 37 Subtotal
970 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 38
971 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 39
972 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 40
973 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 41
974 Block: 290950140081000
975 Block: 290950140081001
976 Block: 290950140081002
977 Block: 290950140081003
978 Block: 290950140081004
979 Block: 290950140081005
980 Block: 290950140081006
981 Block: 290950140081007
982 Block: 290950140081008
983 Block: 290950140081009
984 Block: 290950140081010
985 Block: 290950140081011
986 Block: 290950140081012
987 Block: 290950140081013
988 Block: 290950140081014
989 Block: 290950140081015
990 Block: 290950140081016

HB 1 117
991 Block: 290950140081017
992 Block: 290950140081018
993 Block: 290950140081019
994 Block: 290950140082004
995 Block: 290950140082005
996 Block: 290950141281023
997 Block: 290950141281030
998 VTD Sni-A-Bar 41 Subtotal
999 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 42
1000 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 43
1001 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 44
1002 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 45
1003 Block: 290950140021021
1004 Block: 290950140051020
1005 Block: 290950140051021
1006 Block: 290950140051022
1007 Block: 290950140051023
1008 Block: 290950140051024
1009 Block: 290950140051025
1010 Block: 290950140051026
1011 Block: 290950140051029
1012 Block: 290950140051030
1013 Block: 290950140051031
1014 Block: 290950140051032
1015 Block: 290950140051033
1016 Block: 290950140051034
1017 Block: 290950140051038
1018 Block: 290950140051043
1019 Block: 290950140051044
1020 Block: 290950140054011
1021 Block: 290950140054012
1022 Block: 290950140054013
1023 Block: 290950140054014
1024 Block: 290950140054017
1025 VTD Sni-A-Bar 45 Subtotal
1026 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 46
1027 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 47

HB 1 118
1028 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 48
1029 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 49
1030 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 50
1031 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 51
1032 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 52
1033 County Jackson MO Subtotal
1034 County: Johnson MO
1035 County: Lafayette MO
1036 County: Maries MO
1037 County: Miller MO
1038 County: Moniteau MO
1039 County: Morgan MO
1040 County: Osage MO
1041 County: Pettis MO
1042 County: Randolph MO
1043 County: Saline MO
1044 District 5 Total
128.476. The sixth congressional district shall be composed of the following:
2 County: Adair MO
3 County: Andrew MO
4 County: Atchison MO
5 County: Buchanan MO
6 County: Caldwell MO
7 County: Carroll MO
8 County: Chariton MO
9 County: Clark MO
10 County: Clay MO
11 County: Clinton MO
12 County: Daviess MO
13 County: DeKalb MO
14 County: Gentry MO
15 County: Grundy MO
16 County: Harrison MO
17 County: Holt MO
18 County: Jackson MO
19 VTD: KC 1101
20 Block: 290950003001001

HB 1 119
21 Block: 290950003001002
22 Block: 290950003001003
23 Block: 290950003001004
24 Block: 290950003001005
25 Block: 290950003001006
26 Block: 290950003001007
27 Block: 290950003001008
28 Block: 290950003001009
29 Block: 290950003001010
30 Block: 290950003001021
31 Block: 290950003002001
32 Block: 290950003002002
33 Block: 290950003002006
34 Block: 290950003002007
35 Block: 290950003002008
36 Block: 290950003002009
37 Block: 290950003002010
38 Block: 290950003002011
39 Block: 290950003003000
40 Block: 290950003003001
41 Block: 290950003003002
42 Block: 290950003003003
43 Block: 290950003003004
44 Block: 290950003003005
45 Block: 290950003003006
46 Block: 290950003003007
47 Block: 290950003003008
48 Block: 290950003003009
49 Block: 290950003003012
50 Block: 290950003003013
51 Block: 290950003003014
52 Block: 290950003003017
53 Block: 290950003003018
54 Block: 290950003003019
55 Block: 290950003003023
56 Block: 290950003003027
57 VTD KC 1101 Subtotal

HB 1 120
58 VTD: KC 1102
59 VTD: KC 1103
60 VTD: KC 1104
61 VTD: KC 1105
62 VTD: KC 1106
63 VTD: KC 1107
64 VTD: KC 1109
65 VTD: KC 1110
66 VTD: KC 1111
67 VTD: KC 1113
68 VTD: KC 1114
69 VTD: KC 1201
70 Block: 290950007002002
71 Block: 290950007002003
72 Block: 290950007002010
73 Block: 290950007002011
74 Block: 290950008001000
75 Block: 290950008001001
76 Block: 290950008001002
77 Block: 290950008001003
78 Block: 290950008001004
79 Block: 290950008001006
80 Block: 290950008001007
81 Block: 290950008003000
82 Block: 290950008003001
83 Block: 290950008003002
84 Block: 290950008003003
85 Block: 290950008003004
86 VTD KC 1201 Subtotal
87 VTD: KC 1202
88 VTD: KC 1203
89 VTD: KC 1204
90 VTD: KC 1312
91 VTD: KC 216
92 County Jackson MO Subtotal
93 County: Knox MO
94 County: Lewis MO

HB 1 121
95 County: Linn MO
96 County: Livingston MO
97 County: Macon MO
98 County: Marion MO
99 County: Mercer MO
100 County: Nodaway MO
101 County: Platte MO
102 County: Putnam MO
103 County: Ray MO
104 County: Schuyler MO
105 County: Scotland MO
106 County: Shelby MO
107 County: Sullivan MO
108 County: Worth MO
109 District 6 Total
128.477. The seventh congressional district shall be composed of the following:
2 County: Barry MO
3 County: Christian MO
4 County: Greene MO
5 County: Jasper MO
6 County: Lawrence MO
7 County: McDonald MO
8 County: Newton MO
9 County: Stone MO
10 County: Taney MO
11 County: Webster MO
12 VTD: Benton
13 VTD: Diggins
14 VTD: Finley
15 VTD: Fordland
16 VTD: Grant
17 Block: 292254701022060
18 Block: 292254701022062
19 VTD Grant Subtotal
20 VTD: Hazelwood
21 VTD: Northview B
22 Block: 292254703022008

HB 1 122
23 Block: 292254703022012
24 Block: 292254703022013
25 Block: 292254703022014
26 Block: 292254703022030
27 Block: 292254703022031
28 Block: 292254703022032
29 Block: 292254703022033
30 Block: 292254703022034
31 Block: 292254703022035
32 Block: 292254703023007
33 Block: 292254703023008
34 Block: 292254703023009
35 Block: 292254703023010
36 Block: 292254703023011
37 Block: 292254703023012
38 Block: 292254703023013
39 Block: 292254703023028
40 Block: 292254703023029
41 Block: 292254703023030
42 Block: 292254703023031
43 Block: 292254703023032
44 Block: 292254703023035
45 Block: 292254703023036
46 Block: 292254703023037
47 Block: 292254703023038
48 Block: 292254703023039
49 Block: 292254703023040
50 Block: 292254703023041
51 Block: 292254703023042
52 Block: 292254703023046
53 Block: 292254703023047
54 Block: 292254703023048
55 Block: 292254703023049
56 Block: 292254703023050
57 Block: 292254703023051
58 Block: 292254703023052
59 Block: 292254703023053

HB 1 123
60 Block: 292254703023054
61 Block: 292254703023055
62 Block: 292254703023062
63 Block: 292254703023063
64 Block: 292254703023069
65 Block: 292254703023074
66 Block: 292254703023079
67 VTD Northview B Subtotal
68 County Webster MO Subtotal
69 District 7 Total
128.478. The eighth congressional district shall be composed of the following:
2 County: Bollinger MO
3 County: Butler MO
4 County: Cape Girardeau MO
5 County: Carter MO
6 County: Dent MO
7 County: Douglas MO
8 County: Dunklin MO
9 County: Howell MO
10 County: Iron MO
11 County: Jefferson MO
12 VTD: Airport
13 VTD: American Legion
14 VTD: Antonia
15 VTD: Arnold W-1
16 VTD: Arnold W-2
17 VTD: Arnold W-3
18 VTD: Arnold W-4
19 VTD: Athena
20 VTD: Barnhart
21 VTD: Brennan
22 Block: 290997002101000
23 Block: 290997002101015
24 Block: 290997002111000
25 Block: 290997002111001
26 Block: 290997002111002
27 Block: 290997002111005

HB 1 124
28 Block: 290997002111006
29 Block: 290997002111007
30 Block: 290997002111008
31 Block: 290997002111010
32 Block: 290997002111011
33 Block: 290997003031000
34 Block: 290997003031001
35 Block: 290997003031002
36 Block: 290997003031003
37 Block: 290997003031004
38 Block: 290997003031005
39 Block: 290997003031006
40 Block: 290997003031007
41 Block: 290997003031008
42 Block: 290997003031009
43 Block: 290997003031010
44 Block: 290997003031011
45 Block: 290997003031012
46 Block: 290997003031013
47 Block: 290997003031014
48 Block: 290997003031015
49 Block: 290997003031016
50 Block: 290997003032000
51 Block: 290997003032001
52 Block: 290997003032002
53 Block: 290997003032003
54 Block: 290997003032004
55 Block: 290997003032005
56 Block: 290997003032006
57 Block: 290997003032007
58 Block: 290997003032008
59 Block: 290997003032009
60 Block: 290997003032010
61 Block: 290997003032011
62 Block: 290997003032012
63 Block: 290997003032013
64 Block: 290997003032014

HB 1 125
65 Block: 290997003032015
66 Block: 290997003033000
67 Block: 290997003033001
68 Block: 290997003033002
69 Block: 290997003033003
70 Block: 290997003033004
71 Block: 290997003033005
72 Block: 290997003033006
73 Block: 290997003033007
74 Block: 290997003033008
75 Block: 290997003033009
76 Block: 290997003033010
77 Block: 290997003033011
78 Block: 290997003033012
79 Block: 290997003033013
80 Block: 290997003033014
81 Block: 290997003033015
82 Block: 290997003033016
83 Block: 290997003033017
84 Block: 290997003033018
85 Block: 290997003033019
86 Block: 290997003051000
87 Block: 290997003052000
88 Block: 290997003052026
89 VTD Brennan Subtotal
90 VTD: Crystal City W-1
91 VTD: Crystal City W-2
92 VTD: Crystal City W-3
93 VTD: Crystal City W-4
94 VTD: Festus Outside
95 VTD: Festus W-1
96 VTD: Festus W-2
97 VTD: Festus W-3
98 VTD: Festus W-4
99 VTD: Flamm City
100 VTD: Hematite
101 VTD: Herculaneum

HB 1 126
102 VTD: Herculaneum W-2
103 VTD: Herculaneum W-3
104 VTD: Imperial
105 VTD: Imperial 2
106 VTD: Jefferson Heights
107 VTD: Jefferson R7
108 VTD: Kimmswick W-1
109 VTD: Lonedell
110 VTD: Mapaville
111 VTD: Marble Springs
112 VTD: Mastodon
113 VTD: Maxville
114 VTD: Meramec Heights
115 VTD: Miller
116 VTD: Murphy
117 VTD: North Jefferson
118 Block: 290997002112008
119 Block: 290997002112009
120 Block: 290997002112010
121 Block: 290997002112011
122 Block: 290997002112012
123 Block: 290997002112013
124 Block: 290997002112014
125 Block: 290997002112015
126 Block: 290997002112016
127 VTD North Jefferson Subtotal
128 VTD: Oakvale
129 VTD: Olympian Village
130 VTD: Otto
131 VTD: Pevely W-1
132 VTD: Pevely W-2
133 VTD: Pevely W-3
134 VTD: Pevely W-4
135 VTD: Plattin
136 VTD: Riverview
137 VTD: Rock Creek
138 VTD: Rock Creek 1

HB 1 127
139 VTD: Romaine Creek
140 VTD: Saline
141 VTD: Springdale
142 VTD: Sunrise
143 VTD: Valle
144 Block: 290997012006056
145 Block: 290997013002004
146 Block: 290997013002005
147 Block: 290997013002006
148 Block: 290997013003000
149 Block: 290997013003001
150 Block: 290997013003002
151 Block: 290997013003012
152 Block: 290997013003026
153 Block: 290997014012007
154 Block: 290997014012012
155 VTD Valle Subtotal
156 VTD: Victoria
157 Block: 290997010021006
158 Block: 290997010021008
159 Block: 290997010021019
160 Block: 290997010021021
161 Block: 290997010023004
162 Block: 290997010023005
163 Block: 290997010023006
164 Block: 290997010023012
165 Block: 290997010023013
166 Block: 290997010023029
167 Block: 290997010023030
168 Block: 290997010023035
169 VTD Victoria Subtotal
170 VTD: Windsor
171 County Jefferson MO Subtotal
172 County: Madison MO
173 County: Mississippi MO
174 County: New Madrid MO
175 County: Oregon MO

HB 1 128
176 County: Ozark MO
177 County: Pemiscot MO
178 County: Perry MO
179 County: Phelps MO
180 County: Reynolds MO
181 County: Ripley MO
182 County: Scott MO
183 County: Shannon MO
184 County: St. Francois MO
185 County: Ste. Genevieve MO
186 County: Stoddard MO
187 County: Texas MO
188 County: Wayne MO
189 County: Wright MO
190 District 8 Total
128.479. Upon the passage and enactment of sections 128.471 to 128.478, and as
2 providedtotherevisorofstatutes,therevisorofstatutesshallpublishthegraphicalmap
3 representation of the official congressional district boundaries as an appendix of the
4 Revised Statutes of Missouri.
✔